My only excuse for not doing enough
Not "Where am I?" but
Prepare the pasta according to instructions
Much love to all!
So, yes, I miss those days of show-off-Mom cakes and pies; of popcorn balls made by neighbors and shared with kids without fear of poisons or contamination.
d) wire it up to a plug until the electrical can be officially connected properly. I was impatient. And a plug worked. I'll show you that technique in another post soon.
The apartment building was another upscale one, under lock and key. We got buzzed in and entered the compound. It is one of those places that strives to be modern in its appearance. I don’t like it. It tried to hard to be modern and in the atempt it looked tacky and had a cold, impersonal feeling. Large walls baracaded the residents into a secluded world of unnecessary beams, odd architecure that did not serve any purpose and lonely, impersonal doors that led to the apartment/compartments that housed people’s esxistence. No one has yards, everyone is boxed into their secluded place and your entire life may go unkown to an outsider until someone comes by to collect your junk. I don’t like the place.
Ugg boots were named that because they’re considered, even by Aussies, to be ugly. They wear them indoors, like anyone else would wear their favorite bedroom or house slippers, and rarely do they wear them outside. Well, I’ve only seen them outside, once, and that person was already in someone else’s house, with their sweatpants tucked into their Uggs. And it was a guy, which was my first clue that Uggs weren’t a fashion statement. I don’t know a single American guy that would be caught dead in them, because of their “fashionable” nature. But Aussie guys (and girls) wear them for comfort, not to look stylin’. I’ve even told some of my friends here in the U.S. that if you see someone outside, in Australia, wearing Uggs… they’re probably American or European.
London Symphony Orchestra
But perhaps not. I know there are angels watching over the pilots as they fly. If I were a pilot, I'd want this hanging on my wall, too.
Extrapolating from what we learn
I love Thanksgiving: the Holiday. I invite you to share my family's traditions. Remember back when the Pilgrim's hung out with their unlikely new friends, the Indians and everyone had a clean plate?
7) I can now run 6 miles! Almost halfway there to the 13 miles half marathon in April. One would think I'd be dropping weight... (yes yes, I know, it's all muscle weight, and that's great and awesome! Shut up, will you??)
That and here my General’s first battle,
that stood alone,
Speaking of class visits, I was able to visit two schools last week without leaving my desk, thanks to Skype. I love to meet my readers but when you have a hectic schedule and live in faraway Key West (and don't like to fly) Skype makes it possible. I spent time with a lively 4th grade class in Birmingham, Michigan, and with the students at an elementary school outside Louisville, Kentucky. All the kids had questions for me.
Officials in Belgrade have warned Kosovo Serbs against holding the referendum, saying it would harm talks with Pristina and Serbia's own bid to join the European Union.
Luckily, I have a staff that can turn on a dime who do their jobs quickly and efficiently…they found the perfect people to feature on television!
New York Mets - apba66and0
I am going to quit smoking cigarettes. I’m not sure when, I want it to be soon. I’m sick of coughing up brown flem, always having a durry hanging out of my lip. The pain in my chest and this cough. I’m over choosing cigarettes over food if I only have enough money for one or the other.
Fredericka then turned to website blocking, which is increasingly used as a popular alternative to blocking internet access to users. The British version of this was the order Newzbin2, though the UK government doesn't propose to bring forward website blocking measures since rights owners can obtain such orders through a court of law -- even though this is very expensive.
The result was 4lbs OFF WOOHOO
After our walk, we had to go back home so Katie could get ready for her next performance - the show must go on, even on a sad anniversary like today. Now I'm sitting here in the theater lobby writing this on my laptop, while Katie is back stage warming up her voice and getting into her costume and stage makeup. She asked the director if she could dedicate tonight's performance to her mother's memory, and he agreed. So tonight before the curtain goes up, Katie will step onto the stage as herself and read a special dedication that she wrote. Her words are beautiful, eloquent, and heartfelt. I think tonight's performance will be one to remember.
With that, I leave you with this: a name should be intriguing, fun, memorable, and profound. Just like Future Nostalgia.
Adviser: So even if your career in politics is over, you could have a career going to state fairs as the man with smallest penis in the history of penises–so that’s something.
Week 6
I was struck when I heard him say this. Not because I was surprised. I’ve had this discussion about using electronic communication as a means of interpersonal interaction for years. I believe it is here to stay. I was struck when he said “life is being lived.” He was right. This isn’t just communication, it is living life. It made me wonder – why are people so willing to live their lives differently electronically? Why don’t they show the same integrity that they do in person?
Yes - you were - you were doing everything, but, in comparison, it felt totally disconnected. What are you actually doing? I can't see any difference at all.
When the sun went down though, the respawns turned to undead, which were much more lucrative for experience, as they usually con’d at our level or above, though some of the plain skeletons still con’d blue.
Kim Soo Hyun’s tug of war with Jin Haeng’s head really was a turning point in their personal relationship, and like getting one’s hair pulled, opening up feelings is just as painful and hard.
It was while he was teaching at Wisconsin that his anti-slavery views became publicly known and at one point he was given twenty four hours to renounce them or face being hanged. He refused but was spared death because of public sympathy for his blindness.
I like the subtitle, that we can celebrate the female spirit. Even more, I like that this book is about the spirit of older women. I'm one, ya know! I counted about 57 women in this book, most of which has a bold black-and-white photo on the right-hand page and a write-up about the woman on the left. I bought the book because I loved the photos and the attitude pictured in each one.The Road Taken ~ by Rona Jaffe, 2000
3) Pour the remaining marinage into a large resealable plastic bag; and beef cubes. Seal bag and turn to coat; refrigerate for 8 hours or overnight.
Burying her was as easy as he thought it would be. Arguably, he didn't dig the hole as deep as he should have, but what did it matter? She was dead, didn't have a job, didn't have a family, and didn't have friends. It's not like people would come looking for her. Michael lit a cigarette and chuckled to himself after he put on the last shovelful of dirt. "It's over," he thought to himself, "She's finally gone."
They showed a prison in Austria, as human and modern as can be, with friendly places to sit, a workout place, and a well organised outdoor space to walk a bit.
I was really glad to see Apollo Performance have a successful weekend with their Subaru WRX. The last time I saw them run, luck wasn’t on their side and battled through a few issues. This time, the car looked to run real good allowing Clint Boisdeau to run the third fastest Street Class time and win the Street AWD class with an 1:58.412.
The Kingdom - I'm so freaking sick and tired of Jamie Foxx. And I still don't get how Jennifer Garner is a big star. Yeah. I can't wait until Chris Cooper starts making movies I actually want to watch again. Jason Bateman, too. Also, did you know that Islam is a totally alien and hostile culture? True!
Happy Tuesday readers!
In order to serve up all at once, I would 1. Marinate fish 2. chop up vegetables 3. roast vegetables 4. make pesto 5. when the timer says there is 15 mins left for the vegetables, start pan frying the fish 6. wilt baby spinach leaves in the microwave (I do this because my stomach isn't too keen on uncooked vegetables. Obviously fresh and uncooked is best.)
Harper Lee had the kind of success most writers only dream about. Shortly after her novel, To Kill a Mockingbird, came out in the summer of 1960, it hit the bestseller lists, then it won a Pulitzer Prize, and then was made into an Oscar-winning movie. Her novel has never gone out of print.
“I do not have a racist bone in my body,” he said.
The Gift of Fire / On the Head of a Pin: Two Short Novels from Crosstown to Oblivion by Walter Mosley (Tor Hardcover 05/08/2012) – Mosley is well established a mystery novelist, but he has dabbled in Speculative Fiction. This ‘double’ hearkens back to the old Ace Doubles (which were popular when Tor’s publisher Tom Doherty worked at ACE) and could prove interesting.
Here are some pictures of Adria and Jaydon enjoying Katie's new bunny. Adria loves baby dolls and is very good with her babies.
With Love Kiss Me Patterned Paper (751211)
These blocks set in the trail commemorate the 2002 Winter Olympics. Each of them lists, rather obscurely, winners of the various events. This one lists the women’s freestyle winners. Shannon Bahrke, silver medalist in the moguls is the only name I recognize. Time passes and the plaques are getting hard to read and losing color. The Olympics provided Salt Lake with an amazing amount of infrastructure, including almost all our public transportation system as well as the impetus for finishing it.
“Gay people are born into and belong to every society in the world,” Mrs Clinton said in Geneva. “Being gay is not a Western invention. It is a human reality.”
Thank you to Ros also for so kindly giving this blog the Liebster blog award a week ago now - if anyone has not received it as yet please free to take this one from me with great pleasure! you are all dear, dear bloggers!
(but I still would recommend everyone trying it if they're ever down in Florida)
I’ll also be checking my energy gel supply in advance and wearing a hat!
On the 3rd floor of Mandarake, they have a collection of cosplay products, as well as some ‘adult’ cosplay things. Mandarake isn’t exactly a family friendly store, but if you feel like checking out some premium and rare goods, check it out. The prices might be a little high, but window shopping has never been so much fun. It’s definitely worth a visit.
_____Sometimes I try to extrapolate long words into my jokes, even if I don't know what they mean
and taste the flavour that's offered to me
So I turned a few bored at work doodles into greeting cards….pretty cool, huh?
The Bridge to Never Land is a great book about two kids, Sara Cooper and her brother Aidan Cooper. The journey begins when Aidan stumbles upon a message hidden in an old desk. It leads the two to a magic golden box with the contents of starstuff/fairy dust. The owner is unknown until they find a man named J.D. Aster, whose grandfather used it to transport the island Never Land to an unknown place. Adding J.D. to the two person adventure, the trio quickly finds the bridge. What happens next is for you to find out.
Chica will also be taking calls from viewers the morning of September 26, so preschoolers can wish their favorite feathered friend a happy birthday live on the air.
This heading caught my eye in the local Melbourne paper last week. I’m always a little sceptical of beer articles in the mainstream news because they always seem to fall into one of two categories – highlighting and over-exaggerating alcohol fuelled street violence or thinly disguised advertorial for one of the big breweries.
So that's where we're at. Still fighting, but its getting harder. Thanks for all the prayers and support, we need them more than ever.
4 eggs beaten well
Should I send a letter of apology? I could try to find out the technician’s name. She told me, but I’ve forgotten.
Edwin Baker
We wonder if those section of French society that are open to getting a better, deeper, more wholistic sense of who the terrorists really are have the stomach for a photo exhibit illustrating the reality of Hamas-ruled Gaza as opposed to the ideological fairy tales peddled till now.
The mosses, waters, slaps and stiles (Breaches in hedges or walls),
Almond pie is just what carnival calls for - fatty, sweet and sensual. There's an obscene amount of butter and almonds in this cake, so it's not only going to make you run that extra mile the next time you work out, it's also going to leave its mark in your budget - you can make three "normal" cakes for the price of this one.
Mark Meadows (REP) 48.74% 2,203
Mom left us! She went to Naahville to play with another dog! Luckily my hu-man brudder is taking care of us! He feeds us and takes us for walkies! And before mom left, she set up a special lunchtime petsitter visit for us! So we get to giro the park and play! This was Ceilidh's first time being taken out by MY petsitter! She was ok! She didn't act up and actually sat for a picture!!
11. Seed of Madness
To cook inside either by means of baking or roasting, after allowing the rub to rest on the chicken for at least an hour (overnight for whole birds), cook at desired oven temperature until internally done (160-165 degrees for me). Of course, depending on the poultry, it's size and whether or not it has been brine will determine the length of cooking time. Do not overcook poultry with a rub, remove after it comes to the correct temperature and is a beautiful, roasted color.
Ask them about their desserts, because the menu isn’t the most informative (only listing Ice Cream, Sherbet and Dessert of the Day). Tonight they had vanilla and caramel ice creams, peach sherbet, panna cotta and gateau chocolat. A had the panna cotta, which was pretty good, and my caramel ice cream rocked. It was a burnt caramel,
Moving into 2013, it was still far from clear how events would play out, but a number of trends made it obvious that there was little hope that things might improve. Various key trends merit discussion here.
Another way of looking at this is to say that the capitalists came to realise that Hitler was there to stay. His power was firmly established. Thus capitalists, being capitalists and therefore pragmatic, decided to put all their money on Hitler. Again, they didn’t cause or create Hitler’s power and success, they responded to it. In other words, these German capitalists of 1930s Germany acted like most capitalists act. They acted opportunistically, not politically.
Speaking of young flame throwers, there is one down in Carolina hoping to crash the NFC South party. Cam Newton ignited the Panthers during a record breaking rookie season in 2011. By most accounts, the possible Madden cover boy is an engaging personality. Why not show some love to the Queen City professional sports fans. Lord knows they deserve it (that’s 20 straight losses for the Bobcats).
Happy Teaching! Lori
Publisher: Ok
So here is my official 2012 Resolution/Project List
I found a really cool dress that fits well! Yay! And Leanne found some cool platform black pumps, or so we thought… Hooray for successful shopping trips!
One method of making soy sauce is by fermenting soybeans, water, wheat, and a special starter containing an aspergillus fungus. This mixture can be fermented for several years, which is the traditional method. A modern method speeds up the process by skipping the fermentation step, cooking the soybeans with hydrochloric acid, and adding caramel colour, corn syrup, salt and MSG. Sad face.
Hey it's Friday and that means that we have a new challenge for you.
Set a large cast iron pan or skillet over medium-high heat and add the oil. When it shimmers, shake any excess flour off the pork chops and carefully add them to the skillet. Cook for about 3 minutes on each side, or until the chops are golden brown. Transfer the pork to a plate and tent to keep warm. Sprinkle about 1 tablespoon of the seasoned flour over the pan drippings (the exact quantity of flour isn't super important) and whisk to incorporate into the fat and cook off some of the raw flour flavor. Add the chicken broth and whisk to combine. Let the liquid cook down for about 5 minutes, or until reduced and slightly thickened. Whisk in the buttermilk then return the pork chops to the pan. Simmer for 5 minutes, or until the pork is cooked through (at least 145 F on an instant-read thermometer). Season the gravy to taste with salt and pepper and sprinkle with the parsley before serving.
Kathryn Bigelow, The Hurt Locker
The Ramona High School Habitat Club has been approved to become a Habitat for Humanity Campus Chapter. Through this partnership, the students will be able to use additional resources and materials to make a greater impact in their community.
Last night I saw Kenneth Williams on a Parkinson from the 1970s railing against what they did to the Elephant and Castle in the 1960s. I take that desolate roundabout wasteland for granted – but once it was an lively place.
Back when I first started this blog, I posted a recipe for Sweet & Sour Pork that Mom had handed out at a business function years or even decades ago. So long ago that I don't remember, but since I didn't even remember making the dish word-for-word when I posted the recipe three years ago, I guess that isn't saying much.
David Roodman, a Senior Fellow at the Center for Global Development, has increasingly become an influential and respected voice in the microfinance community. My first weeks at Grameen Foundation coincided with discussions about Due Diligence, his recently released book on microfinance, and in particular, on ways for improving the industry. Everything I’ve seen and heard tells me it’s an exceptionally balanced work that raises important, prudent questions. (In my role with the Marketing department, it’s been especially interesting to be part of the process that unfolds as an organization responds to what has been portrayed by some as pretty harsh criticism.)
So, that’s pretty much everything which came up at the top of my head. I will post more, definitely. Hopefully you found this useful. If you are worried about the people not speaking English, most of them do speak basic English. You will understand for sure. And if you have any questions to ask me, please do comment and ask me. I will do my best of help you.
Also, it’s particularly convenient, though not entirely scientific, to point out the certain symbolic quality of the repetitions of the circles seen in the tree trunk and to compare them to our own experiences. Each new year generally brings on many of the same ordeals and daily occurrences time and again. And I know I personally have thought I have made so much progress in my own personal life, only to find myself back in a position I was in years ago. Thus the whole abstract idea of repetition and circling back and such.
Gradually add the eggs and then the yogurt and vanilla until mixed thoroughly.
Glassmans response – under the title “Blue Labour” looks for all the world like nothing so much as a pale imitation of failed Policy-Wonkage on the right – never a good move. In fact, it looks suspiciously similar to “The Project” launched in the early nineties by Mandleson, Blair and Brown, now thankfully over, or so we thought…
The before photo is on the top and the after is on the bottom.
As you probably know, we are a one-income family with six children.We do not qualify for government assistance to help us with the various therapies and doctors' appointments that Samantha will need, nor do we have insurance to cover these expenses. I have placed a secure Paypal donation button below if you would like to help us ensure that sweet baby Samantha gets the best of care. Thank you so much and may God bless you.
There is no magic formula for what will make one of the canaries pick up a book. (Well, yes, there is, but that might be just me.) But there are certain things we look for. As with anything in life, presentation is everything. If you’re requesting a review, personalize your email. Follow whatever instructions the reviewers have. Check out the reviewer’s site and leave a quick comment. Slip in a compliment. Present yourself with friendly confidence. Follow directions.
This cold weather makes me think I should have brewed the black lager I've been threatening to do for so long. Maybe next weekend.
If I havent mentioned it (Rob, Unforgettable) I don’t see it returning.
“It’s all gone, Snake!”
The first 2 to 3 weeks, I trained consistently twice a day, and I was able to increase the resistance up to "2.5", which seems to be a good improvement. I found that breathing very hard on the bike was not easier but more manageable, in particular for longer efforts. So the first couple of weeks definitely saw a positive training effect to the new load.
otherwise I might to a bit batty!! lol
When thickened, remove from the stove top and add in the chestnut puree. I am a little paranoid, they look a little grainy so I blitz them with my stick blender and strain them once more to make sure all I get is a perfectly smooth velvety chestnut custard.
Boll – the director of critically acclaimed video game adaptations like Alone in the Dark and BloodRayne – has already begun filming in the Czech Republic and Tallahassee, Florida.
And because you made it to the end of this non-picture post, a little surprise!
Alright so MY 11 questions are:
Alternately, the chicken can be baked using the following directions:
Behold, a blah secondhand dresser in need of some serious love.
August 12, 2011 — Judge Belvin Perry upholds Judge Strickland’s order, ruling that Casey Anthony must return to Orlando to serve one year’s probation for check fraud, reporting no later than noon on August 26. The judge declares that her residential information during the probation period may be kept confidential because of threats made against her life.
*The Birds: A pricy, celebrity-packed neighborhood that cleaves to the steep mountains that rise above the Sunset
Sandi’s said her pancakes were perfect, fluffy and delicious. My corned beef hash was outstanding. At most breakfast places, corned beef hash comes out of a can. But it was obvious that this corned beef has was made fresh, with tiny chunks of potato nestled into a perfectly seared bed of finely chopped lean corned beef. The eggs were large and perfectly cooked. Even the toast was better than I expected.
London for Six Poor Men and Six Poor
I knew this year would be different because of the earlier start.
For example, I also believe in an employer’s right to let someone go if he does not fit in with that person’s team. That, to me, is the essence of what we call employment at will, a management tenant which prevails in the USA. In a small group, everyone has to fit together, and you inevitably have situations where one person does not fit, even though they may be technically competent.
I can't go on. The rest of the article is such a festival of worn-out cliches and infantile prattle that it drains me just to read it.
Aside from loving Elphaba herself, I really enjoyed Maguire's narrative on several levels. First off, there is an obvious fantasy element here -- this is Oz, after all -- but there's also a distinctly historical feeling to this book. At times I felt like I was living in Victorian England, at times Nazi Germany, and even Nixon-era America. The various regions of Oz were colorful and unique, and I enjoyed getting to know them through Elphaba's travels and their representative characters.
Preferably both at the same time: chocolate covered pretzels, kettle corn, peanut butter cups...You get the picture!
After surviving all of it, over and over again, realize this. Even though it feels as if you are back in the same hell, without having made even a tear drop full of progress, take a step out and look at yourself from this perspective.
Motion occurs when an object changes position. When an object moves in a certain direction, we say it is in motion. Think of a car driving down the street. When the car is moving, it is in motion. An object that is not in motion is at rest.. Imagine a moving car stops at a red light. It is now at rest. Motion can happen in any direction. Ob-jects can move up or down, left or right, forward or backward. Or, objects can move in more than one direction at once. Thank about an airplane flying up and away from us at the same time! READ MORE...
The school library is an essential partner in the local, regional and national library and information network.
All these ideas were shot down during the design conceptualization meeting with my son.
The past is gone it's all been said.
No pressure or anything, right?
- A nip of Goldschlager
As in all the very best developments it is the attention to detail and the well done features that set them apart.
For its part, the Palm Beach Post editorialized against the lawsuit. Andrew Marra wrote for the paper:
CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION (CDC). Prevention and control of influenza: recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 2004; 53 (RR-6): 1-40.
Please stay with me whilst I get back into the swing of things. Having a house takes up so much of your time! I can’t wait to get home every night to just potter about and get everything organised for the next day. I love it!
Without any further ado, let's start with the gowns....
We'll begin our project by having students generate their own questions to research on our topic. I created this Animoto video to introduce the concept of thick versus thin questions.
Every man wrestles with belief in God. Some embrace Him and some overtly reject Him; some toil for their whole lives and ultimately reject him by default purely because they never accept Him.
The rest of my week was pretty adventurous and exciting – almost died kayaking because I forgot about my wet exit, but an eskimo rescue happened, so it’s all good.
Please comment and let me know.
I normally don't set goals at the beginning of the year.
It’ s you who made me believe,
After the questions ended, people filed out. We stood around and spoke with his family a bit. Later, we were able to speak with Wiebo on the grounds of the festival. I thanked him for sharing his story. I told him I was glad he was able to make it instead of the producer. He seemed surprised by this. When I said it was his and his family’s story to share, he seemed to understand.
“The whole purpose of the social host ordinance was to curb problems we see in St. Cloud and specifically on the south side,” Sgt. Jeff Oxten of the St. Cloud police department, said. “The ordinances were geared at giving us an extra tool to help curb some of the things like underage drinking and the problems that go along with it.”
What about the rest of what is on that NASA page? While I do not have the data to refute all of the points listed, I do have the data to refute, or at least very credibly challenge, several data points they have listed.To see a long list of IPCC retractions go HERE, HERE, and HERE.
And smile. We love when people come to the slam with a smile on their faces.
Ever feel like you are seeing things? An angel or a vision just appears to you? Or perhaps you were able to see the aura surrounding a loved one, yet didn’t trust it was real.
“Maybe lend,” I cautioned after my two-second brainfart. He then stared at me quizzically. “I can give her a call and see if she can give me some money?” I suggested, hopefully.
The freakouts are pretty freaky. I was hearing more shades of Sonny Sharrock than usual tonight, I think. The effect can be startling: as if Chet Atkins suddenly threw out some death metal. Sometimes, like the whiff of cheesiness, it isn’t clear whether this is tongue in cheek – but done with such verve, who cares?
Want some music to go with this? The Addition and Subtraction Songs on the Musical Math CD and DVD are really fun ones that my kids love! Check it out here.
2) she’s schizophrenic
Cross out words, leaving behind the ones you like.
Esses desenhos sao de uma cena de Robin Hood e como podem ver, Robin foi desenhado bem diferente da versao final. Eles tiveram muita dificuldade em decidir num design para Robin e eu suspeito de esse seja o primeiro design que Milt criou antes de mudarem. Eu gosto do design final mas acho esse mais interessante.
I just wish I could go to bed and turn off like I'm sure the rest of the world does. It's so exhausting. Here it is nearing 1:00 am and I'm wide awake. I actually got out of bed because, rather than obsessing over something I forgot to do, I opted to get up and do it.
Among some American Indian tribes, it is believed that the message of a white buffalo is that humankind should live with the understanding that all living beings are linked and interdependent. The birth of a white buffalo is an opportunity for all people to collectively focus their energy on the peaceful, healthy and harmonious world, Little Soldier said.
Off with that girdle, like heaven's zone glittering,
What isn’t swallowed up
Callejon: 11
Way to go Denyse. You have now joined a long line of failed prophets!
Atelier Cologne is a niche perfume house based in Paris and New York. Each scent is intended to embody a “singular moment” of memory and experience. We present to you Orange Sanguine. “It was the kind of moment you would want to revisit. Everyone was here, gathered on the terrace for breakfast, and the scent of fresh oranges was diffusing in the yellow heat. A symphony of their laughter and waves hitting the cliffs played in the air.”
Harvest Moon's relationship with Rutgers was a side point noted to patrons of Thursday night's dinner. After the dessert course of chocolate cake pops, head brewer Kyle McDonald was kind enough to take a few moments to explain the brewpub's interdependence with Rutgers' ag program, and how Harvest Moon's executive chef, Michael "Tank" DeAngelis, added Rutgers farm bacon and beef to the anniversary dinner menu.
Holy living now be
The other day at Five Points Bottle Shop I picked up several, including:
Thanks so much for stopping by once again, girls! Make sure to check out Aileen and Ellen's fabulous wedding blog for more inspiration and, of course, swing by CB next Thursday for another beautiful floral-based board from the girls! See you then!
Me, I think it has something to do with being little weasels.
I think it is absolutely absurd that during these very serious political times, we are discussing personal sexual recreational activities before members of Congress The discussion in congress is not about 'personal sexual recreational activities' (please note just how Rush phrased this) it is about making sure that comprehensive insurance policies include contraception coverage. Rush is trying to make the fact that she was providing testimony seem sordid and tawdry by trying to slide the focus away from medical care and over to recreational sex.
Athelstan Digby was conscious of a strong feeling of dislike to the man.
When he returned home to NZ I had him draw the tree of life from the photos, Its quite long, 30inches and I started thinking about how I would go about stitching it. Although at that stage I had not seen any Turkish embroidery I set out to research and find out what I could, this was long before I had a computer, and isn't it so much easier today to put what you want into google and up it comes. After being introduced to an excellent book by the tutor of the Master classes I attended in Auckland, I was able to get a second hand copy for myself.
The day after coming back to work, I was still in happy spirits but sad to be back. I was surprised when I walked into work and my co-workers said “I glowed and looked slim”. I thought to myself “really??”, remembering the visualization I had of myself glowing. A co-worker who didn’t know I had gone away walked by me and said “You look really happy, did something happen?” When another co-worker filled her in she said “Oh, vacation? yeah, that explains it!”
your still the sweet on the top shelf
I am delighted to share my favorite room on Paloma's blog today. As a relatively new blogger, she is definitely an inspiration to me. While I feel that our entire home is one big work in progress, I would say my favorite room-of-the-moment is our family room. For the most part, it's "my room" after every one goes upstairs at night, but during the day, it's also a hub of activity. And, the thing I love most about the space? I was able to pull it together using almost all bargain resources--everywhere from Craigslist to consignment shops. Nothing matches, which I feel gives the space a more collected-over-time look and feel.
If one were somehow to go into this book fresh, having no familiarity with the film or the story, this would be one hell of a good read. Mary Crane, recently having lifted a hefty sum from her employer, flees from her old life en route to a new one. She stops at the nearly-forgotten Bates Motel, where she piques the attention of motel proprietor and mama's boy Norman Bates, who watches her through a secret peephole as she undresses, filled with a combination of lust and disgust. In short order, Mary is attacked and killed while she showers by the titular Psycho (Norman's frail and feeble mother)...and that's when the story really begins. Mary's fiancee and her younger sister form an unlikely alliance with a licensed investigator, and eventually the local police, as they attempt to discover the missing girl's fate. To say anymore would spoil the surprises...if five decades of time hasn't already done so.
well, about 85+ degrees and an hour and a half later...
I stumbled across a quotation in one of my favorite books this morning that seems to sum up what I’m feeling about my novel manuscript right now. I’ve sent her out into the world, and I tensely await the world’s feedback. Writing those 60,000-or-so words has taken many thousands of hours over a period of about two years. There were moments when I loved the actual hours of dreaming up words and sentences. And there were hours when dragging a single phrase out of the mental quagmire felt like a slog in swirling, waist-high water. And when I thumb through that stack of pages, I feel surges of emotion—pride and disgust, terror and thrill. To sum it up, love.
Chips………. and dip
Owner and brewmaster Chris Johnson opened his production brewery and taproom in 2009 after working at Lafayette Brewing Company. His beers can be found on tap at several locations around Indianapolis.
For you will still be here tomorrow, but your dreams may not.”
Here are the schedules for each level:
oven and by no means dilute their flavor by taking the peel off under water.
The stations were somewhat visually sparse in appearance to attract you to them. An estimate for activity levels at all the stations seems to be 1,000 cyclists stopping by.
Chapter 13
Many have put their hearts on what they do.
Does change in your locality upset you, despite knowing it is for the best in the long run? It must be in our nature I suppose change can be unsettling. I admit I was upset to see what looks at the moment like devastation, but since then I have remembered that we have to think of future generations not just ourselves.
I've heard it in the chillest land,
It was one of those gigs where you can almost feel the hype as you walk in the door. Happily, Anna Calvi more than lived up to her reputation. It was another no-pit gig so I was down the front in the crowd trying to both hold my spot and not get in the way. Sometimes being a gig photographer is a bit of a lonely thing... we rarely get plus ones and there's a lot of waiting around (especially when there's no pit and you're in at doors) so it's always nice to catch up with other friendly photographers, or meet a new one. On this occasion I met the lovely Rugfoot and we passed the time talking about photography. When she came on stage in her trademark red top & matching lipstick, Anna Calvi wowed from the start.
Anyhow, these last few weeks have been tough. I have come to the realisation that not only does my boss not like me, but that the school has no intention of promoting me in the near future, as they had heavily 'hinted' at, probably to stop me from moving on. Well, they've shot themselves in the foot there, as I'm applying for other jobs. The aforementioned school have managed to wear down my confidence so much, that I was just looking at regular teaching jobs at first, until the Head of English at a local school asked me why on earth I was underselling myself and nudged me towards applying for Second in Command. Now that's a title I like!
Now, I have left your argument regarding Jesus having a “spirit body,” for last. You have continually brought up 1 Corinthians 15:45 and seem to be using it as, really, your only objection to my view of the kingdom thus far. It seems that the very foundation of your view of the kingdom is based on this “spirit body” argument, so I think it is appropriate that I address it here.
Adams' new zone at PSU would drain about $50 million from the county's coffers over the zone's 30-year life. It would also divert about $60 million from Portland Public Schools, Kafoury said, although the formula for calculating that figure is complicated and it could be lower.
—James Delingpole, columnist for the Daily Telegraph and the Spectator and author of Welcome to Obamaland
It would be very interesting to see the performance metrics used to determine the NAMA CEO’s 60%-max bonus. Profitability of the agency? Mightn’t that encourage hoarding of assets and the sale of low-lying fruit? Recovery of loans but by reference to what NAMA paid or the loan’s par value?
Gillian Philip's Firebrand was my favourite book of last year, introducing Seth McGregor, another fay or fairy who is as much like the little winged folk as David Starkey is like Camilla Batmadjeli.
That’s what the boy wonder said when I told him about the end of a year. He is very aware that May 2 is his birthday and that he’ll turn 6. He’s been counting the days. He’s long had the key dates of the week memorized. His birthday is May 2. “The Avengers” opens on May 4. A friend’s graduation is May 5. His birthday party is May 6, and so is his mom’s birthday. He can recite them on cue, if needed. To him, this is a huge birthday, because what birthday’s aren’t? And I guess by throwing him a party he thinks we revel in the passing of another year the same way he does. When I told him I was somewhat sad about him turning 6 because I really enjoyed him at 5, Ian was surprised. It took him a moment to process.
2 tsp powdered chicken stock (optional)
Jesse Joe Hernandez received lethal injection for the slaying of Karlos Borja 11 years ago.
2008 – Current situation
Satellite – The launch of Nimiq 6 is scheduled for mid-May, followed by the launch of Anik G1 in the fourth quarter – Telesat Q1 report.
Eels Novocaine for the soul US
JUDY’S 3-LAYER KEEBLER BARS
The Journal of Global Theology (Foundation University) seeks to provide insight into the study of Christian Theology from a decidedly Global perspective. We offer readers an opportunity to view theology from various viewpoints while at the same time maintaining both an orthodox Christian viewpoint and an openness to differing Christian traditions. We seek contributions from every corner of the globe and encourage especially contributions from Asia, the Pacific Rim, the African continent, and the Middle East. Nonetheless, contributions from North and South America and Europe are also welcome. The Journal of Global Theology is aiming to promote scholarly discussions, contributions and dialogue in the following fields:
The frequency in the scientific pitch notation holds a musical chord value. The value the frequency holds more is the musical chord it represents.
Alight at Bras Basah, City Hall, Clarke Quay or Dhoby Ghaut. Walking time about 8-10mins from each station.
PR Director
When it comes to my “style” I keep it pretty simple. I’ve got a solid rotation of amusing t-shirts, roughly four pairs of jeans—all the same make and model of Wranglers—in varying shades of blue, and a bunch of different hats for each season.
goodness in a crockpot. and added bonus, my little veggie lover has
Pietro Beconcini Agricola
The new beginning is moving along. I'm still not sure how I'm going to mesh it with what I already have, but I'm not quite up to that point yet. I just hope that my crit group will think it makes sense. They're looking forward to reading it, which is always a nice feeling.
In case you can't tell, I still haven't found my creativity, so any suggestions for future reference would be greatly appreciated. I like the doily and the butterflies and I want to use them again.
Following just behind that will be the monetisation models, whether that is in the form of pay walls for specific online content or new forms of advertising and promotion, because eventually brands will want to leverage the news media’s online clout.
There aren’t a whole lot of similarities between Ikemen and HanaDan on the surface. But really look at it: in the manga at least, we had a hopeless best friend character pining after Makino the way Yuki pines after Miko; Rui and Shu fall firmly into the romantic rescuer who dries her tears after Mr. Ikemen-Prince is a jerk and gets no credit category. The Domyouji stock character is there in the form of Princess Ren.
It's so far away
SINFUL DWARF
The water lapped against the side of the boat as I came to the dock on the island. It was quiet this morning. Fishing season was over, and it was still early. The only one stirring was me, and perhaps the lone seabird that flew overhead. I tied the boat to the dock, picked up the box and leapt onto the dock. My girl scout days were long over, but it would hold. Probably.
Promise of Yesterday – Marylu Biloxi works as a servant in Pennsylvania years after the War between the States, but she dreams of a home of a family of her own. She doesn’t figure she’ll ever marry though, at least until Chester Jones comes through the door on an errand. Chester’s tongue has been cut out by cruel master, so he can’t talk, but he can communicate just fine. Still, he has a lot of wounds to heal from. Will Marylu and Chester be able to find their hearts desires?
People make entrances and exits in our lives daily, some for a reason and some for a season. The fact that I have had a consistent agent of compassion and change in my medical life and my life of spirit for a decade and a half puts me in the "Lucky Bastard" category and also in the category of "Grateful Bastard".
However, in the process of finding this out, the ENT found something else. I have a deviated septum (the divider in your nose) that has allowed one of my sinuses to become too large. It is entirely possible that this is contributing to my migraines - something else that I would love to reduce. I'll be having surgery over the summer to fix this, and hopefully help. I would love to be headache free, or at least majorly reduced!
Are you going to buy into this latest gimmick to lull you into a false sense of security? Will you foolishly, like the umpteen times in the past, cast away your nagging doubt and creeping sense of dread and stick your head back into the quicksand?
SUPPLIERS
Thanks to you all who came to play last week - beautiful creations as always. the RPT has done his stuff - luckily he did switch on! And he's picked Emarie Email me your details with the challenge number in the title please.
B which heroic Tam was able
But how do you see that
Certainly the BNP poses as a patriotic party opposed to multiculturalism, and it has racist overtones, but there is no lack of patriotic Left-wing regimes; opposition to multiculturalism is now mainstream and racialism was not unknown even in the Soviet Union.
Fishing for Numbers is a simple, quick game where students practice basic facts in addition and subtraction while using problem solving strategies. The first player rolls two dice and says the numbers. Then he/she looks at the empty spaces on the board and decides whether to ADD the numbers or SUBTRACT the numbers. Once a choice is made, the player says the number sentence aloud and places his/her marker over the answer. Play alternates in this fashion until one player covers all the spaces on his/her board.
Waldo ReStore
157. His english name is Kevin Li, but then changed to Kevin Wu Because of personal reasons
Allen, who earned over £200,000 a year in prize money, clearly felt the £1,000 fine for highly offensive comments in China insignificant as how else could one explain this latest outburst aimed, once again, at the Chinese people as a whole?
It takes a level of determination, conviction, and bravery that I can only hope to imagine, for an individual to speak this sort of truth in the face of such coercive power.
I was 24 years-old when husband Randy's announcement shattered my world. He had met someone when he was away on temporary duty with the Air Force.
Then they moved on, placing the baked goods in a plastic box in the fridge. They decided some fortune telling was in order, and, retrieving some paper, they made cootie catchers. They asked them lots of questions, and one of Qayte's could see the future. Once the dog had attempted to eat Qayte psychic fortune teller and they had grown bored trying to think of new questions, they decided to play a game of M.A.S.H. They wrote down their categories - where they'd live, what kind of house they'd have, how many kids they'd have, how much their salary would be, what their job would be, their car, and where they'd have their honeymoon (and of course, who their husband would be) - Cole chose two options for each category, and Qayte chose two. They were playing to see Cole's future, you see, so Cole chose one's she wanted, and Qayte chose one's Cole really didn't want particularly, thanks. Then they played, leaving Cole with a good mix of good things (husband, type of house, um..something) and bad things. Then they played for Qayte, which was hilarious. Really hilarious. But anyway, they had to get on AIM right that instant and inform Qayte's future husband of their discovery, which they did. Unfortunately, the future husband was idle, so they talked to....um...need a new name...Anna? Alice? could just use her name, I suppose...Abbi, instead, and they asked her if she wanted to play M.A.S.H. Once a little wikipedia had explained to her what it was, they had her choose her options, and they selected another option, one each. Abbi wound up with fairly Hi-larious results, which I can't recall. Meanwhile, the future husband got on, and he was informed of his role. This startled him, but it was all good. They also did M.A.S.H. for Kyra, which was funny, because she got Johnny Depp for a husband. They asked Qayte's future husband awkward questions, several of which he would not answer. They discussed his children, and how they wanted them. It was Cole's opinion that he should have, like, ninety kids, and fill up whole orphanages, so everyone could have his children. Then it was very late, so they went to bed, but Cole insisted on checking her Myspace first, which just goes to show you how low she had sunk.
You have just read (hopefully without nodding off) my WOYWW post which I'm linking up to Julia over at the Stamping Ground where she hosts a weekly hop of our work spaces - where ever they are. We usually show what we are up to (or not) and show everyone how tidy we are (or aren't).
One cannot help wondering what the lawyers would have made of this. Yet justice was undoubtedly done. And here the narrative presents not just a conundrum but a challenge.
I decided not to color anything in, but the lamps, to keep with the clean sepia look. Spellbinders Fleur de Lis dies and some of their Labels line, made the perfect frame. It holds a flourished transparency, that represents the sweeping wind. I sponged it all off in creams and a very light brown. I apologize for the lighting, but I deliberately kept the light low and in a contrast, so you could see the transparency I used as the base of my card. It's written in French with all white ink, and it's hard to photograph, but I hope you can see the detail.
Do you have beautiful, wonderful, memories that are sitting somewhere collecting dust? Or are they frozen on your hard drive somewhere just waiting to be printed and showed off?
Moral of this story, start at 7am and be ready for a huge project because there is no such thing as a little project, and stay away from home depot for your plumbing needs. If you do bring a belt, because that young man sure needed it badly.
Cone: V = 1/3 Bh, B = area of base
2) Return to Manarch, get outside and go east till you see the coast. Hug the coast and continue north until you see a boat in a scene similar to picture 2. Be warned a boss fight is coming so you may want some company.
Eden will be one in just a few weeks.
Yes, another female power couple named Alice and Gertrude. Although unlike the Parisian bon vivants of the day, the true relationship led by Austen and Tate continues to remain closed to the world. They were companions for the rest of their lives, even through the troubling trials that would soon befall the residents of Clear Comfort
I'm not opposed to self/vanity publishing. I think there's a place for it and that it can peacefully coexist with traditional publishing. I think which way you go depends a lot on your goals...
I did not find the article particularly helpful since my allergist gave me the same basic advice from a medical perspective and the medical remedies have worked for me over the years. I will try the sinus rinse, however, even though it doesn’t wash away pollen it should soothe my aching head from the inside-out. What I really want to do is take an Allegra and crawl back into bed! Instead, I will soldier on and hope that when I take my family on vacation next week, I will leave my allergies behind.
Free educational resources for parapsychology, psychical research & mind magic.
Pre-heat oven to 180° Celsius / 355 F.
So I’ll make my own movie.
“If religion were true, its followers would not try to bludgeon their young into an artificial conformity; but would merely insist on their unbending quest for truth, irrespective of artificial backgrounds or practical consequences.” — H. P. Lovecraft
That cycle of splurging, being guilt, clinging to austerity and then splurging even more is a punishing one. It ruins everything, because eating yummy desserts feels terrible, not eating anything desirable feels miserable, and splurging again feels like moral failure. Every dieter has done it, and most consumers have too.
On the microscopic scale, the problem is one of "neuro-inflammation" caused by activation of Microglial cells, inflammatory cells in charge of cleaning up dead and dying material in the eye. Enter Mayo Clinic ophthalmologist Raymond Iezzi, M.D and his colleagues who worked with Nano-engineers to develop a Nano-particle called a Dendimer, that has enabled them to deliver Steroids to the retina and reduce the inflammation. According to Dr Kannan, a collaborator of Dr Iezzi, "The activated Microglia in the degenerating retina appeared to eat the Dendrimer selectively, and retain them for at least a month. The drug is released from the Dendrimer in a sustained fashion inside these cells, offering targeted neuroprotection to the retina."
At this point is where you need to keep your form as perfect as you can. So, lets review. Make sure you are Driving the weight up by keeping your pressure in your heels and pushing your knees out over your toes. Make sure your Back stays tight and your squeezing shoulder blades together. As you reach the top Squeeze your glutes(butt) and return to your start position. Now, is when you can exhale your breath. If your going for another rep (BadAss) then take another deep breath and hold it again throughout the movement. If your finished with your set, control the weight and take small steps back into the rack. Don’t be sloppy with the weight but make sure you have the bar in the hooks before you relax and try to walk out of the rack.
LATITUDE: 11-15.79N; LONGITUDE: 148-54.00W
Before that, Moore received his first college exposure as a student-athlete at Hutchinson (Kan.) Community College, where he started on the nation’s preseason No. 1 team as a sophomore in 1989-90. Moore’s success as a player began at Wichita South High School, where he earned all-state honors after helping his team to an undefeated season en route to the 1988 6A Kansas State Championship.
2. What is your favorite dish that your Mom makes?
I keep forgetting about it.
Sewing Instructions:
If a student has taken a test on that objective before, I can use quick look to check which questions I gave them on the previous tries.
Before Moon could think any more on the matter, his and the other Mod dogs faces of astonishment noticed that Black Pudding was looking up at the sky and sniffing again!
In the meantime, here is a song I will leave with you by The Magnetic Fields.
I Kings —O.T.—Bible
"The darkness is indeed ignorance, and we can no longer afford
By the time this post goes up, I’ll be in Wales doing publicity in schools for my new book Sword of Light. A rather strange choice for an author tour you might think… until you realise my book is about King Arthur’s daughter and part of it is set at Camelot. Since there isn’t a Geography Girls blog (at least not as far as I know... are you out there, Geography Girls?), I hope you won’t mind this post on Arthurian geography as a change from Arthurian history – after all, archaeological digs are a good way to uncover history!
At my school, we use the Treasures reading series. Our story this week is African-American Inventors.
Unroll the dough and stretch it out a little. Then place gently over skillet, cover entire top but keep from going over the edges if possible (it won't matter if you don't though), trim off edges. Brush with the beaten egg and bake for 20 minutes, the top will be golden brown. Remove from oven and let stand at least 5 minutes before cutting.
I will never get over my frustration that my apartment building has no outgoing mail slot.
* 1-1 1/2 organic bananas
Anna Kendrick, Up in the Air
The do-it-yourself bug is spreading. Being able to build a custom bookshelf for the family or a bunk bed for your kids is a rewarding experience that’s beyond description. For those who want to jump in and join the bandwagon they have some common questions: what tools do I need and how do I get started?
Red chilly powder- 1/2 tsp
I read avidly as a child and particularly loved books by Elizabeth Goudge, Nina Bawden and E. Nesbit. I also adored the older series fiction produced by Enid Blyton, Laura Ingalls WIlder, Willard Price and many, many others. However I stopped reading completely between the ages of 13 and 16 because there were no stories that I could relate to as a young teenager. I only started picking up books again once I'd found my way into the classics (through school) and contemporary adult fiction.
We had a different trainer this time, Mickey from the USA, so she brought a whole new slant on things. It was far more tiring this time, maybe me, maybe the weather, I don’t know. The training was more relaxed, but its the first time I’ve heard so many people question the method and disagree with it. What their final verdict is I can’t tell. There were Germans, several Americans, mostly due to the USA airbase in the area, a Dutch couple, a Swiss lady and me as the token Brit! This time, the trainees themselves were discovering things about themselves, which shows how powerful this therapy can be. There was annoyance when it was not picked up that a trainee was in tears, but I could see why myself. It was a totally unreal situation with people watching, a disparate band of people who didn’t know each other and a task that wasnt related to this group situation. The trainers did debate what to do, and I think they made a right decision to let the group deal with it. In real life, a parent, sibling or friend would deal with this. My only question is that if you are providing emotional safety, is comfort a part of this?
My Dt Cards are both New Whoopsi daisy images and i have been handcrafting flowers using my graphics software and punches ...lots of stickles......the background on the second card is a bearly mine insert
I do have four blog posts set to auto-publish this week for you, but if I don’t moderate comments until next Monday, you will know why. I’ll miss you all!! xoxoxo
The husband, Nassim Mimoune, was hustled outside by security personnel, arrested, and charged. At his trial, the presiding judge noted that Mimoune had set “his religious dogma above the laws of the Republic and his French citizenship,” and that was unacceptable in France.
Now, back to Hyrule. If you follow my tumblr, you noticed that this week I had been playing Zelda Twilight Princess. I am asking myself why people like Midna??? I mean, I think she is annoying, cute, but hella annoying. Super demanding bitch! :''D
Not surprisingly there is quite a bit of opposition to it. I have just made a submission (on behalf of Transition Newcastle) to the planning process. I found it quite hard to write as I don’t know what arguments will carry weight nor do I know where to get really reliable information.
-115F heatwaves
Emmerdale: Jeff Hordley (Cain Dingle)
This week on Sepia Saturday I have used a photograph of the kitchens at Windsor Castle which was taken in 1878. Whilst in the process of cutting and pasting the image I was a little surprised to discover that my old friend, HM the Queen, is claiming copyright on the image. Recent reports suggest that the dear lady has a personal fortune of some $500 million which makes her claim of copyright on the kitchen photograph a little over the top.
Look, she’s a good friend and this rare lapse in judgment should not be such a great mark against her as a human being. Besides, lavish period romances set on doomed luxury cruisers rendered lovingly in CGI just aren’t for you. You could not have known that without experiencing it, much like the time you tried flax seed butter. Remember? You tried it. It wasn’t for you. It’s OK. WHAT IS FLAX SEED?? Everything will be OK.
In recent years, your credit card debt , Loan consolidation has come about as being a good answer for those who have acquired held in different kinds of financial obligations. Normally, many experts have found folks misused the different fiscal tools and ended up being drowned in enormous hemorrhoids of financial obligations. Sooner, that it was bank cards, now a whole new kind of debt is harming the fiscal life of folks.
Carabao shows are always sold out. They play the largest stadiums in Thailand and have made intercontinental trips to play festivals in the States, Switzerland, the UK and Germany. It helps that these places have rather large Thai ex-pat numbers, but even so, it’s still pretty impressive considering the type of music they play and where they come from. Their shows in Bangkok are always madness, with audiences out of their seats bopping away Thai style (Thai bopping is something that can’t be explained, you just need to see it to understand).
My old coworker and friend, Noel and I went to see Lion King on Broadway which brought back many memories for me. I had forgotten that I owned Rhythm of the Pridelands, the soundtrack for the broadway album many years ago so each song was very familiar. I was reminded of performing The Circle of Life shortly after the movie was released. I collaborated an electronic version of the song on my keyboard with African type instruments and performed it at the VA hospital. My sister helped me get the timing right. I remember I struggled for a long time with the collaboration of all the sounds and the timing until she literally took me by the hands and made me dance it out. I was probably 11 years old at the time. I remember she wore a handmade African skirt she received from some friends she met from Africa while serving an LDS mission in Athens, Greece. She wore that skirt to my performance.
I’m thinking of this:
In my lifetime the women’s role in administering care and mercy has changed. They seem to have less time to magnify the feelings of charity and benevolence that the Prophet Joseph said comes naturally to them (see History of The Church, 4:605). Life has become harder and more complex; in some ways, it demands more of all of us. It has become more difficult for mothers and wives to meet all of the challenges and expectations that are placed upon them. Our seemingly insatiable appetites for material things suggest that probably these demands could very well increase in the future.
This whole dinner took me less than 10 minutes to prep and was great because my daughter could help with each step. She loves to sprinkle the cheese and stir the eggs. By using whole eggs and egg whites you can really cut down on the fat and cholesterol without sacrificing any of the taste. I used 2 % milk which made it taste pretty rich, but you could use skim milk if you wanted. If you want to splurge, whole milk would be delicious. One of the things I like most about this is that this meal has something from all the food groups making it not only tasty and satisfying, but healthy too. It doesn’t get much better than this. You could also mix in any veggies you wanted and could top this with sour cream, salsa and even some fresh cilantro.
Wow, was I amazed! Not only did it clean the whole wash, but the smell was heavenly. I tried Spring Meadow (it also comes in Ocean Mist and Mystic Forest) and the scent was delightful. My laundry truly smelled fresh as a spring meadow---without even adding softener or any other scented laundry product. And the smell was light and fresh, not heavy like other laundry products I've tried.
Undoubtedly various people today have got their own arguments in regards to the reason these need any mobile phone. Some people want above 1 regarding several needs. What ever factor it happens to be, i hope a person’s justification is definitely value the software.
1) What in your life drains your energy?
I find that when I piece things I cut with the rotary cutter, I use a scant 1/4" seam, but with the GO! I have to use a true 1/4" seam to get the shapes for fit together well.
And the problem is this, we were bought with a kiss
So I help him into the tub after I get the babies into the living room. They are screaming, but I remind myself that they are OK. Walker is burning up. There is puke in the van. I still have scabies laundry to do. There is still melon all over the high chairs from breakfast. I send Brad a text, he says don't worry about the van. I am reminded again why I think he is so fantastic. I smell a stinky diaper. I take care of it, and at the same time pull Walker's booster seat out of the van and set it in the driveway. The babies bang on the window letting me know they'd appreciate lunch. I figure the sun is a disinfectant of sorts. I go check on Walker. He is ready to get out of the tub. I get him some clothes and a blanket and a pillow. I half-wrap him in a towel and realize that this baby is a giant and is not easily wrapped up anymore. And he is burning up. And the babies are screaming. I help him get dressed and get his splint-walking boot thing back on. He wants to watch TV, our antenna is not getting PBS today. I have no clue how to get netflix on the xbox. I send more texts to Brad. I get the high chairs wiped off and get the babies settled in for lunch. A cup of milk satisfies them for the time, while I go back up to give Walker some re-hydration mix from the pantry. Brad texts me about the TV situation. Walker gets that figured out. I come down stairs give the babies some raisins, they are giddy. I am thankful they are so thrilled by raisins. I switch out laundry. Brad says to try some motrin for the burning-up-boy. I go upstairs, he's chatty, we try motrin. He grabs the trash can. You can figure it out. More texts to Brad. Back down stairs to cut up some cheese and turkey for the babies. They are thrilled again... I eat some turkey too. Back up stairs with Tylenol and a syringe to give 1ml at a time to see if he can keep it down. Oh and benadryl to help with the nausea. Back down stairs to refill the high chair trays with cheese and turkey, and a few crackers. And I think Walker would like some crackers too, so I bring some up to him. The xbox is frozen, more texts to Brad. I remember I'm supposed to drop off a snack at PWOC tomorrow. I realize that will not happen. I give the babies one more handful of raisins for a healthy dessert. They clap! I go back up to give Walker another ml of Tylenol, he got the xBox figured out. Smarty. I tell him I am going to get the babies ready for their nap. I pray that they are ready for their nap. I pray that Walker won't puke anymore.
Coming up..school and university holidays in South Africa means visitations from the kids - this time younger stepson and his girlfriend. Always so great to have them around. The weather has taken a turn towards the very chilly, in honour of the upcoming solstice. We of course are completely unprepared for such coldness, but it warms up beautifully during the day, and the days are generally glorious, I have to say.
forecasting triple digit
Now just in case I get disqualified for having more than one hero, the one I would nominate (if my arm was being severely twisted) would be Joanne Scrace of the notsogranny fame. She is truly inspirational, a real go get it girl for several reasons:
My own circumstances are tied up in what's going on around like 99.9% of us. My day-job is at the mercy of a group of people who think they're surgeons, but are in fact local butchers on speed, with all the aptitude of a nutter wielding a scalpel shouting "slice, slice, SLICE!" In the publishing world, my books are at the mercy of the bean counters who are shouting "Sell now! Sell now! SELL NOW!" In both cases I'm at the mercy of really panicky, impatient people. A shame really, as in both areas of work, patience is more than a virtue. In my day-job, the cogs are so huge that if you stare at just one part of the machinery it doesn't seem to be moving, yet step back and you know the machinery is moving actually better than most machines in other countries and it actually has a purpose. In the writing, again patience is something bookselling needs: patience to get the best book from the author to the publisher; patience to get the book selling from someone quite unknown. Patience, patience, PATIENCE!
When I actually see or sense a predator (my senses are very keen) I freeze so as not to be noticed. I don’t run from them as that would only encourage them to chase. This may or may not work for me. If I have fooled the predator I am safe. If I have not, I quickly leave my body and become food for the other. My Spirit, my essence, lives on.
Instead, after the game, we had a pint at some secret restaurant that only those privileged with extremely good, court-side-type tickets have ever seen. Those VIPs can enter the place privately, away from the rabble, dine finely in soft pools of light while the masses team rowdily above. (I caught sight of Paul Allen roaming outside the restaurant after the game.) I trust this kind of lifestyle is not in my future.
“It is disgraceful that our health care reform is being held hostage by the U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops and our message to liberal and nominal Catholics is that it’s time to quit the Catholic Church,” she said.
.jackknifed rig
32And the Lord gave Lachish into the hands of Israel, and on the second day he took it, putting it and every person in it to the sword without mercy, as he had done to Libnah.
It can also be used to rename a file, by moving the file to the same directory, but giving it a different name.
Turning to social media, Professor Sookhdeo looked at the use of Facebook, Twitter and YouTube in the Arab Spring. He noted that while Hilary Clinton established a series of ‘tech camps’ in Middle Eastern countries in 2010 to teach locals how to use social networking to bring tyrannical leaders, the US was prone to shutting down its own social networking during civil unrest in order to quell riots.
"It's your problem."
Lyrics Translation:
-make curtains
(4) Michael Wincott was the voice of Death.
I just wanted to post a reminder about the Ronzoni Smart Taste Photo Contest. Just by voting you can win a $25 Gift Card! The contest ends this Friday, June 25th. Feel free to vote for us (photo above) or any photo you love. The link is below!
Pueblo Estrella Music Presents: Voyages Extraordinaires, Queen Bee's, San Diego.
‘The more I studied and the more I understood seriously the biblical message in its entirety (and not simply the “gentle” gospel of Jesus), the more I came to see how impossible it is to give simple obedience to the state and how there is in the Bible the orientation to a certain anarchism.’
We awoke to the sound of the bus coming to a stop. It was very early in the morning, and we were struck by the chill of the high altitude location. As we collected our luggage, a few taxi drivers started to offer us a ride. We politely declined, whilst we gathered our bearings. The area seemed really run down, with hardly any lighting, just a few buses and a number of very weary hostels in sight. A quick yet simple conversation in spanish was enough to determine we weren´t supposed to be here. We hadn´t even heard of the place – Desaguadero. My friend´s phone went off – “T-Mobile welcomes you to Bolivia”. We stared at the coach driver with utter bemusement. How did this happen?
This is a not-so-clever attempt at making sure that the Christian message never makes it out of private homes and churches. And it would be an astounding constitutional revision—one that puts faith under house arrest. But perhaps it is not so astounding, when one considers how our American president has been busy pushing the novel idea of “freedom of worship” to replace our inalienable right to freedom of religion. This sleight of hand starkly demonstrates what “freedom of worship” really means.
This is the story of Jac and her brother Robbie. They grew up around their family’s French perfume company, but as they grew, Robbie stayed with the company and Jac moved away from it. It isn’t until Robbie disappears that Jac has to go back to the place of her childhood to find out what happened to him. Through the course of these events, the reader is also plunged into a history of reincarnation — from that of the ancient Egyptians to the beliefs of Tibet’s people.
‘And when mortally injured he knew
05. Overlooked
I know, you're all shocked, right?
Yay, it's May, and I haven't posted yet! May is my favorite month, and I'm not being bias because my birthday is in a week...nope, not at all. I love May because it really is what spring is all about in my opinion.
‘Oh no not my Mum’
What else is there is this material world,
And like a tumultuous wave, the ecstasy will pull me under
Chu’s directing the PMAs to help carry out this Administration’s green energy aspirations on taxpayers’ and ratepayers’ dime is bad policy. Smart-grid initiatives should be led by the private sector—if they make sense—and the role of government should be in identifying and removing regulatory barriers to private-sector investments. PMA infrastructure that needs upgrading or replacing should be paid for by bringing MPA rates in line with market rates for electricity, instead of burdening taxpayers with additional spending.
Well, like I said, I don’t trust my kids that way. The idea that their brains are an extension of mine is silly. Their brains are their own. They will assess and react and choose in their own ways, not mine.
Being a female in the world is unfair. Life is unfair. Men, sex, the weaker sex... women. My next book will touch on this subject. I am in the middle of reshersing why women are rarely considered great authors. All the authors I look up to are male, aside from two. Lydia Lunch, and Sylvia Plath. I will throw Anne Sexton in there too. Sylvia and Anne are poets. I'm not a poet. I'm a contraction. I let men take advantage of me. I look up to Gloria Steinem. Her raw sexual magnetism that she put to use as a feminist. I look up to Courtney Love, she's crazy, but very intelligent. She might be a bit narcassitc but so am I. Virgina Wolf is the female writer I feel a great connection to as well.
**If you are thinking, “What the heck did I just read? This isn’t Simply Solo!” then please let me explain. I would like to begin sharing more of my creative writing with you all. I started this a little last week with I Want Romance, and I’m hoping to share more creative/fictional/non-autobiographical writing about once a month. I hope you enjoyed this piece and I would love to hear your thoughts. As you can imagine, it’s a little scary to put my writing out there for the world to see!**
In another bowl combine add the flour, baking powder, ginger, and baking soda. Whisk to blend together.
Play practice starts this week. I am excited this time, I think it will be a fun play. I hope, anyway...
McMarthy 2
Okay, let's be blunt: the final scene doesn't even exist, and the last chapter leading up to the final scene has absolutely nothing going on.
Excuse me for not laughing. Our father's justice gets closer, and I'm on a sugar-free diet.
We've had a lot of fun with Lincoln and Washington this week. We've learned a lot about them and decided which of their hats we would rather wear. I had to find a way to use my mustached photos in the hall...I think most of my kids look pretty terrific in their hats. I would vote for any one of them. I do think that a couple of them look more like pirates than presidents...I should have found some powdered wigs!
Q: What is the significance of Arghya (offering water to the sun)?
Moreover, even if Mali’s classe politique manages to sort out a smooth return to constitutional rule, the country’s greatest challenge remains before it: fighting the rebellion and reunifying the country.
A good way to add liquid blood into the lunch box is to add it to 100% cherry or cranberry juice. Mix it half and half for a great lunchtime treat.
As you would soon find out were you to attempt to set up an organisation or group exclusively for white people, that would be racist, and probably illegal, whereas there are a phone book full of organisations, pressure groups and clubs exclusively for blacks, Asians or other minorities ,which are not only not racist or illegal but are often generously subsidised by the tax-payer.
As I mentioned above, Wikipedia is every SEOs competitor. Whether you like it or not, it may not be directly competing for business in your market but it is competiting for rankings and traffic in your market, which generates your business.
So when forty groups known for their hardline approach to anything and everything under the sun;notorious for their promotion of sectarian violence in the country;their odium for anything not Islamic;groups that have been banned and repeatedly made UN’s list of terrorist outfits year after year join hands,paint on a gaudy display of guns and chains on a yellow banner,congregate a couple of otherwise insignificant remnants of Zia’s legacy;the nation braces itself for the latest contagion to strike since dengue last year:Difai Pakistan Council.
When we were kids we couldn’t see the inner workings of these places, bar a few discarded slips on a sticky old carpet; now the whole process of betting is laid out to us and demystified whether we like it or not. Look at any football site, whether it’s a blog or national newspaper and the eye will be drawn to ads telling you what a certain bet could win you. You can tune these ads out, but sometimes odds will be inserted right into the articles.
Liverpool (1) v Man City (0) – Wednesday 7.45 – Live on Sky Sports 1
I've been on pins and needles the last few weeks waiting for an offer and one finally came on Wednesday. The placement I interviewed at on Tuesday offered me a spot and I accepted right away! I'm so relieved to finally have this mess taken care of. I can finally breathe easy and start focusing on other aspects of my life again.
What was this forest savage, rough, and stern,
as though my brothers were sick.
Attach ruffle to towel with a french seam: Pin ruffle WRONG sides facing to towel material, sew with 1/4" seam allowance, trim to 1/8", iron seam allowance up and then fold ruffle over so that right sides are now facing, pin and sew, backstitching at beginning and end.
NOW - the hard part. Coming up with a name! Husband and I have different tastes when it comes to names. While we both like old names - he wants archaeic names! (Ewald anyone? bleck!) He's still insisting on naming her Stanley. . . what am I going to do with him?
C from Obscureddreamer @ http://obscureddreamer.wordpress.com who nominated me for the Reader Appreciation Award, click on the link or picture to visit her blog filled with stunning Poetry.
(wilton moss green & wilton aster mauve)
which is an amber coloured Czech lager, all the others listed above are pilsner style beers. For ale drinkers there's virtually nothing available (I don't know whether the former Whitbread-brew, White Label is still around, but from memory it was pretty awful). Harveys however, stock two low-alcohol beers in their pubs. Both are produced from regular Harveys beers, before some of the alcohol is removed. John Hop is produced from the company's Best Bitter, whilst their Old Ale is used to produce the dark beer, Bill Brewer. Both have an abv of 1.0%. I haven't tried either in many a long year, but from memory the Bill Brewer was slightly more drinkable than the John Hop.
There’s a lot of so-called “hard men” around who actually are just bigger and stronger than average, and who like to throw their weight around to “impress” their so-called “mates”. Well in my book, beating on smaller, weaker people doesn’t make you hard – it makes you a bully, trying to make up for your teeny dick by hitting people you know ain’t gonna do you over.
An example of this sort of defense is through the work of the second century apologist, Justin Martyr who lived from 100 to 165 AD. He was converted to Christ by reading the Scriptures and then took it all the way to Rome confronting none other than the then Emperor Marcus Aurelius, the Roman Senate and the Roman people in general. His contention was that the Christians were greatly misunderstood and the persecution was demonic. He defended the faith by showing that Jesus Christ was the fulfillment of Old Testament prophecy
All in all this is a fascinating conversation and we apologise in advance if the quality seems poor but we have tried to make it as clear as possible. I have now added this conversation into my talks and use it within the slide show, conformation of what we have been saying by one of their own heads of LEGAL services.
because the thing is, he will only know that my name is Victoria and that i live in Indonesia. he knows my facebook page and knows my twitter username, but that is all. because the thing is, i will never tell him.
DSL: In his zone. "I like hugging people. I think they like hugging me. This world is moving so fast, sometimes you need to embrace that human embrace." (Not a real quote)
From birth until life closes;
It takes a whole lot of work to make it onto my shit list. It is an extremely short list. You can add your name by fucking with me, my husband, one of my family members or one of my close friends. Get there quicker by fucking with a combo of any of these elements.
I had been healthier just before I caught the infection that put me back into acute mode than I had been in a long time. I went to a fund-raiser supper at the church for the first time in years, literally, and I did it without the wheelchair or the oxygen. So people saw I was alive and still wanting to be part of the church community. Maybe that is why I got cards, phone calls, prayers, meals, etc., but probably not. It didn’t surprise me how much it all meant to me. I hope I have been able to convey that in my thank you notes. And I hope to be encouraged enough by these acts of love to move toward keeping community a part of my life. After all, the church mission statement is: “Love God, Love Others, Serve the World.” And one of my favorite scriptures is Jeremiah 29:11 “For I know the plans I have for you,” declares the Lord,”plans to prosper you and not to harm you, plans to give you hope and a future.”
Add the brown sugar to the saucepan, give the mixture a few stirs, cover, and turn the heat to medium-low (it’s important to begin slowly so the rhubarb warms up and begins to release its liquid). Cook the rhubarb for about 15 minutes, covered, until the mixture is saucy. Remove the cover and increase the heat to medium. Cook for 15-17 minutes, stirring continuously, until the rhubarb is completely broken down and thick enough that a spoon leaves a trail at the bottom of the pan.
The bookmark has magnets in it so it can keep your place right to the line. I need to make some more of these for gifts.
I've had this one planned for a while, but couldn't decide how to pull it all together. Nothing like a deadline to make that happen! Creativity under fire. Either you thrive on it (I do) or you falter.
Straws rattled over dying ice chasing the expensive swills of Coke. Echoes of chomps at the smelly noise of popcorn formed a susurrus backdrop to the quiet bits of the film. The quiet bits being almost worse than the noisy bits.
How much yer chairs an’ tables cost, how great yer luxury;
It’s fun to review the year with all its travels and interesting people. We have welcomed back alumni, some of whom will be attending their seventh workshop with us, and met new participants who are now alumni themselves.
Stamp - Wicked Cool
He's definitely had hiccups at least 6 times so far. In fact, he had them when I started this post. It is truly the cutest thing, it really is.
Earl Blackwell, editor of Celebrity Register; founder of the publicity agency Celebrity Service; the man behind Marilyn Monroe's singing of Happy Birthday Mr President; and the happy owner of the most beautiful ballroom in Manhattan, was a native of Atlanta - the city where, when in town, he shared a Michael Greer-decorated, eight-bedroomed carriage house with his sister and her four children.
You could call it a new groove. The school groove.
Holds from all soldiers chief majority
Is there anyone who would consider an old shoe to be desirable decor, even if it were filled with flowers? I guess it could be a fun present to give to your cousin the podiatrist. But he’d hate it and then he’d keep it for years just in case you came over.
Another new annual that captured my attention at Ecke’s was Bacopa Atlas Lavender - a wonderful complement to last year’s new Atlas White. Both have beautiful extra-large flowers - a real plus with Bacopa. Also keep an eye out for Coleus Stained Glassworks Luminesce. I thought the strappy leaves of this variety just popped with color.
Don’t let new shoots be scorched by cold snows.
Yes, it’s true… When I got married the first time, I was very young. In fact, I was so young, that you could say that I was a child groom.
You say it's the only way I'll ever see the light.
forgave myself for letting the kids quit music lessons last year (fear of not enriching their lives)
Maybe write your new story and write your rhymes?
Viola Davis, The Help
In the wake of the democratic revolutions sweeping the region, the State Department is rapidly trying to reevaluate its approach to Middle East democracy promotion. But without a budget for fiscal 2011, and with no idea of what awaits their budget in fiscal 2012, State is being forced to move money around to speed funds to the Arab countries that are trying to make the difficult transition to democracy.
The final recipe I took out for a test drive was our favorite, Powdered Sugar Doughnut Muffins. These little mini muffins are nicely spiced with nutmeg and then rolled in powdered sugar while they are still warm. They are fantastic little sweet bites, paired with a tall glass of cold milk. Plus they are extremely cute.
I hope you are having a great Spring :)
In Henry Mayer’s excellent The Press in Australia (1964) I can only find one mention of a communist journalist, Rex Chiplin on page 184, but it does not give details of where comrade Chiplin worked. According to some sources he was a reporter on the CPA paper, Tribune; so does that count? I’ll have to check with the chief judge (Dr Henderson).
HIS KINDNESS,….
Over the course of the past week, my life has been saturated with people afflicted by great loss and sorrow. Members of our church family, and dear friends of my brother and sister-in-law, are dealing with the tragic and sudden loss of their 16 year old son. Precious cousins are dealing with the end of their mother’s battle with cancer. And other sweet cousins of mine are reeling from the loss of their father. All of it brings back memories from four years ago, when my family stood by my father’s hospital bed helpless and unable to stop the disease that was ravaging his lungs. These are the moments in life when nothing makes sense and words become meaningless. Times when we find ourselves questioning God’s goodness, because of the hardship we are in the midst of or the tragedy that besets us. It is during these moments that our faith is either strengthened or shattered. Will we rest in the comforting arms of our Savior, or rail against a God we feel has abandoned us?
A lot of your choice and cost may depend on the choice of your provider. It’s not to say the more you spend the better you will be. Rather, a reputable practitioner, who is truly trained in the placement and restoration (and this may be two providers), may be a significant factor in what you end up with and what it costs. Trust and reputation are the more difficult factors to define for the patient.
The Pakistan government’s apparent duplicity – and awareness of it among the American public and political establishment – could have enormous geo-political implications. It could jeopardise American financial support: security-related assistance is conditional on Pakistan’s cooperation on Afghanistan. Moreover, it could trigger punitive counter-measures by the US and its allies, or direct military action against the Afghan Taliban in Pakistani territory. However, an aggressive American response to Pakistan’s conduct is only likely to generate further instability, especially given the army’s on-going battle against Pakistani militant groups and widespread anti-American sentiment among the population.
-Playing most of his career with the Dodgers afforded Gil the opportunity to play in seven World Series, of which the team won two. In 39 Fall Classic games, he hit .267 (35-for-131) with 5 home runs and 21 RBI. In Game 4 of the 1955 Series, he went 3-for-4 with 3 RBI, and his 2-run homer off of Don Larsen gave Brooklyn a lead it would not relinquish. He drove in the only pair of runs in that year's Game 7 clincher, completing a comeback from a 2-0 Series deficit against the Yankees.
True to Cartoon: FE 9, RID 6
During the time that Hunter's heart problems were detected, doctors also discovered Jennifer had an unknown heart condition, and the twins she was carrying were likely to have a heart a condition as well.
Okay enough about me, now on to the star of this blog. Sasha is so much fun! She jabbers constantly, loves to dance and watch Tangled. Her favorite song is "I Have a Dream" One of these days I will catch it on video but every time I pull it out she won't dance. So lame! But I'm sure she'll warm up to the spotlight soon enough. She's a lot like me when I was a kid- dancing in front of the mirror, always wanting to look pretty, loves to play outside in the sun. We're definitely signing her up for some dance classes here soon and I think she's going to love it.
Yesterday Cameron was visibly angry at being called to the House of Commons to answer an Urgent Question. The possibility of answering Urgent Questions is something I had never heard of, but something which I think is a good thing, if used properly. A PM must come forward to answer the elected representatives of the people if required. His obvious disdain for the House of Commons yesterday showed us all how little he really thinks of the people.
I went back, demanded my pickles, then with rebellious triumph, snatched a fist full of duck sauce on my way out.
(this was yesterday’s mud mess)
5 tbsp butter (70 grams)
Sadly, the mitsubishi vehicles uk on country roads since we first experienced it on its launch a few bags of pea gravel or scoops of topsoil for the mitsubishi vehicles canada will also hold its value better than a car this small should provide ample entertainment and a cutting edge all-wheel-drive transmission system to help it deploy that power, the mitsubishi vehicles uk a cracking steer but get any smaller than that and it feels a little lethargic but keep stirring the mitsubishi vehicles uk, keeping the mitsubishi vehicles uk above 3,250rpm and it feels cataclysmically quick.
He then hands me a single strand of coconut from the top of his muffin.
Do you make straight people go, “Homo please!” or does your own kind reject you?
Obviously, I never consulted her again.......
For dystopian fiction, the short story format is a bit of a drawback. There’s not enough space for world building, but some of the snapshots provided are compelling enough to make the reader want more. Some of the best stories were “Berserker Eyes,” by Maria V. Snyder, “Now Purple with Love’s Wound,” by Carrie Vaughn, and “In the Clearing,” by Kiera Cass.
So after all that, here is Knox's nursery!!
So here is the final product! I am rather proud of it and can't wait to wear it out!
the present holds its breath
Abbott also noted that the Texas Legislature had authorized compensation for false convictions "including a person who received a posthumous pardon," language which "appears to recognize the shift in United States Supreme Court precedent."
I registered for a community care group geared specifically toward women. The initial gathering of all who registered was last night. Since registering, I prayed that God would hand-pick the women with whom I would be joined.
Love Yourself
Wow, I can't believe it's been since June that I've posted! What a bad blogger I am, lol! Well, I've been taking it easy this summer....and the girls and I have been having a blast! Julie has been taking swimming lessons and Rachel plays at the beach playground and I sit at the picnic tables and relax and chat with the girls there. What a blessing this beach has been this summer, omgoodness!! Julie has been going ALMOST everyday for free swim......missed a few days here and there, but for the most part, we've been there most of the summer.
News reminds me again the Governor has stated our 3-year water drought is over. Our annual rainfall and mountain snowpack exceeds the norm expected. We are admonished to still use conservation measures though the critical necessity has passed for now.
If you see this guy in New Plymouth, get outraged.
May saw Dallas turning Nine. NINE!!! I can't believe I'm old enough to have a NINE year old! Really? It doesn't seem like it was that long ago that he was born! He's such an amazing little man. He has such a good heart and he is SO smart! This little boy LOVES to read! He's recently demolished all 7 of the Harry Potter books. And it only took him 3 months! Here he is on his birthday:
Several frozen raspberries
Black activist with strong anti-white views. Member of AmericanCommunist Party and San Francisco Communist Party. Said George Bush caused the 9-11 attacks and wanted Bush investigated by the World Court for war crimes.
Jesus did not say, “men always should ask the same thing over and over of God.” In fact, Matthew 6:7-8 says: But when you pray, do not use vain repetitions as the heathen do. For they think that they will be heard for their many words. Therefore do not be like them. For your Father knows the things you have need of before you ask Him.
The Blue Planet - a cobalt blue (taken from a patch on the Earth) - 14.50.102
From all parts of Iceland people flocked to the ceremony and dignitaries came from various European countries and from America. From Denmark came King Christian the Ninth, thé first of its sovereigns ever to visit the country. On this occasion he presented to his people a constitution containing important new reforms (such as the granting of legislative power and partial control over financial affairs). This was one of the stages in the gradual recovery of national independence which had been lost 1262-64; next came Home Rule (an Icelandic minister in charge of Icelandic affairs resident in Reykjavík) in 1904; fourteen years later Iceland became a sovereign state in union with Denmark (the King of Denmark being also King of Iceland) and finally came the foundation of a republic (with an Icelandic president) on the 17th of June, 1944.
I would take my revenge!
By this time, it had been about a half hour to 45 minutes since Samuel had woken from his nap. I'm sure he was hungry, itchy, and just all around miserable. He ended up gagging when the PA was checking his throat and vomited all over his blanket (his blankie!) and me. I was getting a little irritated when I was calling for help and nobody came in. And the nurse couldn't figure out if the O2 sat lead was supposed to go with the light on the top or the bottom of his toe. Honestly. But she was the only one who wasn't competent that evening.
Willow branches,
So . . . Do all the long arm quilters stick their butt out when they quilt???? I think that is probably just me ;) I decided that rather than using a pattern I would take a deep breath and jump into the deep end. Yup, I went all out and did free motion, and I tried a new design!!! And I have to say, quilting on these machines . . . So Fabulous!!!!! You have so much freedom. You can do such a larger scale design then on a home machine. And the fluid motion is so nice. I was flying down the quilt in no time. Ya basically, I totally loved it!!!!
With all the different kinds of Italian food it is important in the Italian culture to savor and enjoy the unlike tastes. Meals are an important way for Italian families to bond by sitting down to a ten course repast that could last around three hours. Since acquiring the tastes is important and because there ar so many courses, the sizing of each plate is much smaller.
The New York City Department of Transportation (DOT) Division of Bridges plans to resume testing the newly rehabilitated Roosevelt Island Bridge beginning on Monday, May 7 at 10 am. Testing is expected to be finished on May 18.
Judge # 2 -- Ho hum, tastes as if the chef literally threw in a can of chili peppers at the last moment. **I should take note that I am worried about judge number 3. He appears to be in a bit of distress as he is cursing uncontrollably.
V/A - Ten of a Kind (RCA 1988, Comp with Gunbunnies, Titanics, Lazy Susan...)
Its origins date back to George Washington who referred to God repeatedly throughout his public and private life. Just before the Battle of Long Island on August 27, 1776, he told his assembled forces, “The fate of unborn millions will now depend, under God, on the courage and conduct of this army.”...
What was the outcome
We left our (very heavy) statue of St. Francis behind when we moved back to North Carolina. And for six years we have looked at various statutes but didn't find one that quite suited us. Far too many were so cluttered with Disneyesque animals that one expected Snow White rather than St. Francis.
2:15 50/50 Raffle Drawing Winner
I'm grateful to Mary Ann for this opportunity to chat about my book. Set in glitzy Las Vegas at the peak of America's real estate bubble, the theme is: Those seduced by greed can lose not only their money but also their sanity and their very soul. Follow the callous and unrepentant con man whose most daring and brazen scam may have gone too far.
B.Sc. Life Sciences
St Bernardus Tripel 8
Although Frank's parents introduced him to the world of art and museums...
There and back again!
Unable to sleep, she goes out that night for a run, but is followed by a stalker with military training. Elena evades him only to discover that he has colleagues and that they are trying to capture not only herself, but also the Winterbournes. In the fight, Elena kills one of the men, Mark, and the three women find themselves confronting a half-demon able to teleport whom Elena nicknames ‘Houdini’, who works for Tyrone Winsloe. Ruth casts a spell which traps him temporarily and the three women make their escape.
This is how I look at the way I relate to my kids. I'm focused on building my relationships with them. They will learn the things they need to know in the process. Other people might watch me react calmly, respond gently to my daughter's anger and impatience, and think I'm missing out on a chance to teach her how to speak politely, or that I'm too lazy to punish her or to fight back. They might shake their heads at my chasing down the wild shots.
You may well have done for all I know, but this strikes me as taking police-public harmony to extremes. I can only close by this time placing Chris Bryant squarely in the frame for litigation, he having asserted earlier this week that “Andy Hayman has a great many questions to answer”. He does indeed: but first of all, somebody has to ask him to.
Cool. I look forward to releasing it. I will let you know when that happens. God bless.
So what does happen now? I hardly know how to go about getting to know my father. I have lived so long without one. I only know that I will do my best to get to know this man with such a good natured face with thick accented and lovingly expressed words of regret and joy at finding his oldest child.
And I wouldn't want to change a thing!
The second installment of my new series, An Artist at Work. Jordan Elise Perme of Horrible Adorables hits the spotlight. I am personally drawn to Jordan’s work due to my fascination to oddities and sideshows, so I just had to get in there and check out her studio and workspace. Jordan creates and designs for plenty of high-quality clients, such as JoAnn Fabrics, but it’s her personal creations that got me. Jordan graduated from CIA with a degree in Fiber and Material Studies, which led her to her day jobs as a freelance toy and textile designer. Horrible Adorables is her night job. She creates faux-taxidermy mounts of very odd creatures. I’m not going to begin to explain these creatures, just go to her site and check’em out.
Taco Bell:
I was feeling better, singing along to Adam Levine, and then, the pepper shaker on the elevated breakfast counter fell onto the edge of my mixing bowl as I was cutting the butter into the flour. Before I could react, the cap had flown off and a shower of dark granules had descended on my flour and butter. Holy *^%?$(*&^?!?% !!!. Was there a toyol in the house?!? And who had forgotten to cap the pepper, AGAIN!?? I was shocked sneezeless and just stared at the blanket of black grains for about five seconds. Then, frantically, I scooped up as much pepper as I could. I got most of it, but enough had worked its way into the flour to give the mix a speckled look and unmistakably peppery smell. No time for another batch! Church was barely two hours away, and the boys were still snug in bed, so into the oven they went.
I had a post written up with some useful links and somehow it got deleted! Grrr (one more time, not my day, so far)... No time to redo now so check out the Oregon Brewers Festival website for all the festival details. And follow them on Twitter and their Buzz Tent Twitter feed.
I'm not suggesting to anyone that they need to pray the rosary - I just totally followed my heart on this one. I don't think about it very much, try to rationalize or mentally understand. I just know that praying the rosary brings me peace, and sometimes, a fire for love and an even-wider open heart, so I'm gonna keep doing it.
3 tbsp Hazelnut oil
If you haven't seen it, then go watch it. You won't regret it.
Honestly, this feeling is so strange
To read how others knit or crochet according to the seasons (or not), Google the code 3KCBWDAY4 or just click here: 3KCBWDAY4.
Loring says Young soon bowed out. But Charles Tiffany proved to be a marketing genius.
Day 19: a place you go often
Like a blanket of anxiety
03. Tema and Variations
Extra Course Videos:
I so so so love the waffle cone. I love the cone MORE than the ice cream that comes in it.
I take no credit for the Monkeysphere and learned of its existence only recently courtesy of David Wong (nom de plume of Jason Pargin, Senior Editor of Cracked.com). In short, its a term borrowed from Anthopologists; notably Robin Dunbar who saw a correlation between the size of a primate’s neocortex and its social group. For us human types, the number is around 150 people. Anyone outside that number exists outside one’s “Monkeysphere” and is in essence dehumanized, reified and relegated to the status of concept or thing.
So what did I like so much about the book? The characters were very well-drawn. The main character's best friend, Jeffrey Lu, is quite the character and made me laugh out loud at his bravado. Indeed, much of the typical boy banter between the two was hilarious. From the hypothetical scenario discussions to the constant name-calling between the two, the dialogue was genuine BOY!
I got a really interesting question from a reader last week about gyms, and I thought I’d take a minute and answer it in this post. Here’s the question:
Kiawah Island golf courses in the south carolina gamecocks history since the 1960's! So you have health insurance then do not want you to maintain employment and travel to and from necessary locations. Contacting a South Carolina realty is the south carolina gamecocks history can upgrade your lifestyle? Who wouldn't? Most of us would enjoy having a larger home with more land, but we don't want to take away your freedom, your driving privileges, and your refusal cannot be wrong. Go there with your partner and see why it is important to highlight however, that there are a fine of $400 and 48 hours of community service in lieu of serving jail time, you may be well advised to politely decline to answer any questions put forth to by law to help you obtain contact information needed to schedule a test. Having a qualified South Carolina locations. The beaches are world-famous and so are the south carolina gamecocks history a little more clear.
who refuse to live in a place like Gilead.
A number of people have come up with creative answer to “Why is a raven like a writing desk.” The answer “Poe wrote on both” is popular, as is “they both stand on sticks” and “they both come with inky quills.” One wit responded with “because there is a B in both and an N in neither,” an answer which was meant to highlight the absurdity of the original question. (Saying it aloud might make it clearer.)
Clinton was a short, stocky, prematurely bald man with a heart made of gold. He was the only veterinarian in town. And he worked part-time at the community college, teaching pet grooming and basic veterinary care. He was a good man with the respect of everyone in the county. Many times people would call on him in the middle of the night needing help, in one way or another. And not once did he say no to their pleas. A person’s inability to pay for his services didn’t stop Clinton from doing his duty as a veterinarian. His love for animals was known throughout the county, and people never thought twice about making sure they paid Clinton what they owed him. He didn’t have to send out bills to his patient’s owner. And because most of them were drawing social security and disability checks, on the third of every month they would line his office walls in order to pay for the services he preformed the month before.
During late June and most of July the meadows, or meads, were mowed for hay. Also called The Strawberry Moon, as Strawberry picking season reaches its peak during this time. This is one of the few names that was universal to all Algonquin tribes.
Then, she'd change to go.
That I should warn you
From this, I decided that I will always take contentment over excitement. It gets the stamp for a “Good Day.”
Have snow to shovel now, first one of the season (finally)!
The final option consists of genocide, i.e. the intentional, physical destruction of Islam in Europe. Note that this would not necessarily consist of the killing of all Muslims. As Muhammad himself would be quick to remind us, one can simply kill off the men and claim everyone else as booty. Given the low regard in which slavery is justifiably held in 21st century Europe, it is difficult to see how the booty option could usefully be applied. However, bearing in mind that the threat of Islam lies essentially in its menfolk, in principle, Muslim women could probably just be absorbed into the nation as a whole, Islam itself withering away as a result of a zero-tolerance policy.
£2m to tear down Northern Ireland peace walls McCord to raise loyalist paramilitary concerns with Robinson Northern Ireland MPs fear losing control at Westminster Permanent memorial for Kingsmill massacre : The Examiner Newspaper of Crossmaglen, South Armagh, Newry and Down Woman in attempt to overturn former IRA hunger striker’s bankruptcy
Paulson Out....
Choosing the right corporate event entertainment company is very important to choosing the right entertainer for your company because they will be able to help you choose the most appropriate entertainer for your company and on a budget that you can afford.
A new music to your soul,
For example, there was no speech therapist. We don't have a regular one of those, and nor do any of the other children with Down syndrome. Occasionally, you might get a half hour session here or there, to a maximum of six per year.
There once was a crafty old witch who had so many bare legs she didn't know what to do! Then one day that crafty old witch had a witchity thought, and decided that maybe, just maybe she could make those legs up!
Seriously, proper training will resume very soon.
News Link:-
“1. All peoples have the right of self-determination. By virtue of that right they freely determine their political status and freely pursue their economic, social and cultural development.
What do I have in common with the Russian mafia? Not much, thankfully, except my friend, Joe Stein, has written a brilliant new detective novel which shows that he knows enough about them for both of us. I first wrote about That Twisted Thing Called Truth here, but since then I've had the chance to ask Joe some pointed questions about writing this sort of book, which is a genre I love but can't imagine being able to write, and about his own experiences that have given him the scary inside info that allowed him to write about such scary people:
Before I tell you what the challenge is, I would like to thank all of you who participated in the last challenge.
But as the clock ticked on, it became very clear that these two old queens weren't fun.
"Great." Abby leaned closer to the old woman, her blue eyes eager. "So where's Mum? I want to see her, now."
3- I was punished by the nuns in Sunday school for bringing a bible to class and asking, “how come Catholics don’t read the bible?”
1. Great guerrilla marketing "means developing a sixth sense for knowing when and how to creatively cut corners," August Turak notes. "It requires a sort of impish instinct for breaking rules. But it also means successfully walking that invisible line between creativity and unethical chicanery."
Stay tuned . . .
I read a few essays on Paganism and Wicca which where quite interesting, and then I wrote this!
It still looks like it could maybe use a little something else, but since these are the primary source of light on either side of the sink, I decided to leave well enough alone, at least for now. I didn't want to interfere with their light casting abilities. Maybe a tone on tone all over stencil would work? For today, I'm calling it good enough. It probably isn't my most exciting project, but it is done, which is more than I can say for most of the ideas that have been rattling around in my head but haven't yet been tackled.
I had to put my dog to sleep that came with the property I live on. I cried like a baby. I was just devastated but it was time, she was 16 years old and very sick. Aza is a animal lover as you know and found a beautiful Shepherd/Collie mix that was chained up in the back of a yard for 4+ months, we went to see him and I fell in love the minute I saw him. He has fit right into the family. He is house broken, great with the kitties and is very handsome. So you can just see how happy he is that he has a solid home and people that love him.
While my own immediate family is unscathed (for now), there are too many people I know who are suffering. Please send a positive thought their way.
I found this card on E-bay for a solid deal from the new 2011 Bowman Prospects. Orange Refractor 11/25! To be honest with you I don't know a ton about Nick DeSantiago but for the price I figured it was worth it. After some research he was drafted out of JUCO and is not projected as a big time player but does have some potential! This is going directly into my Braves PC!
Blues: BG01, BG05
Where do you get your ideas? From up here (pointing to his head) same as you.
Regardless, this picture was taken at the airport in Milwaukee, and I thought it was a smashing acknowledgement to the effect traveling through airports can have on a person. Workers there have given the post-security area, where passengers can lace up their shoes and reassemble their carryons, a new name. How fitting is that?
I’m on an Edith Wharton tear at the moment, and it’s striking how beautifully she sets her love scenes, on every visual and sensual level, like this setup from THE HOUSE OF MIRTH:
02 My First Lover 4:34
I’ve never attempted “the act or process of reconsidering and changing or modifying” like this before. Sure, I’ve written a book halfway, scrapped it, and started over. But that’s one book, during a single sitting, as it were. This is several books, to be condensed into one in three parts, long after I’ve moved on to countless other projects. It’s an odd combination of familiar and alien territory.
Ladies and gentlemen, the Republican candidates for president of the United States.
Everyone walks into our lives for one reason or another. It’s not necessarily clear why they enter our lives when they do, but they enter it and leave it with a purpose. We are meant to know them when we know them. It’s up to us to figure out why we were blessed to have them in our lives, no matter how brief an encounter.
And thus, this lovely loaf was born, with really no effort at all. The next time I will have my kids make it, honestly. It is that easy. You just need time and patience.
This card will be entered in the following challenges:
Accessories: pleated ribbon, rhinestones
(iii) The whole of low lands between Gandaki and Koshi in which the authority of the East India company has been established.
2. A proper bar cart, maybe a vintage find or DIY'd option. Something with open storage and a handy surface, but moveable. This is my favorite option right now, although I'm worried about clutter . . .
Total: 17 points
One of the recent surprises in the garden was one of our carrots going to flower. This isn't normal, since carrots are usually biennial. They put energy into building a big root the first year, and then focus on making a flower and seeds the next. Since we're trying to save as many seeds as possible this year, we considered saving the seeds, however the only thing relative around to pollinate them would be a common weed Queen Anne's Lace. Chances are, the cross between the two would make a new plant with a spindly root. Not worth the attempt.
1. Heat the oven to 400 degrees. Spread the hazelnuts evenly over a cookie sheet and roast until they darken and become aromatic, about 10 minutes. Transfer the hazelnuts to a damp towel and rub to remove the skins.
One of the recurring themes of the recently completed World Championships was that of up and coming athletes breaking through to the big time. While it was clear in Zurich that it’s time for the season to end as many athletes are now weary, several of the upstarts in Daegu are clearly out to prove that their performances in Daegu were no flukes.
He lives, and I shall conquer death.
This whole discussion sends my mind back to one of my favorite economics jokes, surprisingly enough courtesy of Jim Henson’s famed Muppets. In the opening scenes Muppet Christmas Carol, Gonzo (in the role of the earnest Bob Cratchet) chides Rizzo the Rat for eating the wares for sale in his apple cart. Rizzo’s classic response, “I’m creating scarcity…Drives the price up.” (If you’re too impatient, just skip to the 3:30 mark.) I guess what was true in this Victorian-era flashback remains true today.
Cooperstown is in mountains (little mountains, big hills, whatever) with Glimmerglass Lake. The town is head to toe with beautiful old mansions, I swear, every street has beautiful homes, inns, stores. The baseball thing is only a small part of it all, and oh my, the gardens too....
On December 18th, 1899, Spain agreed to the Treaty of Paris wherein Spain surrendered Cuba, Puerto Rico, Guam, and would be paid $20 Million for the Philippines. Many considered taking only a single port in the Philippines but McKinley feared that allowing the Spanish to retain control was unwise, even if they did not keep it, they might sell it to other European powers. On December 21st, McKinley issued to the Filipinos a Proclamation of Benevolent Assimilation (what nation could resist such a thing? LOL) that would be published in January in which America assured our "little brown brothers" that we had only their best interests at heart. Needless to say, having just cast of the yoke of one imperial power, the Filipinos were not eager to take on another. Aguinaldo rapidly issued a counter-proclamation, "My government cannot remain indifferent in view of such a violent and aggressive seizure of a portion of its territory by a nation which arrogated to itself the title of champion of oppressed nations. Thus it is that my government is disposed to open hostilities if the American troops attempt to take forcible possession of the Visayan islands. I denounce these acts before the world, in order that the conscience of mankind may pronounce its infallible verdict as to who are true oppressors of nations and the tormentors of mankind." Tensions rose.
I'd be lying if I told you that I initiated conversation with him because he had amazing form doing all of his work-out, the guy's a total hottie. Talk about six-pack abs, short, grizzly hair, standing six-foot tall and used to be a football player for the Dragons down in Sydney *wink wink* (looks like Str8cam Jeff)
This is a show that is probably in the almost completely safe zone. It should be back unless something weird happens.
Over my car's radio yesterday morning I caught the end of an interview with an author talking about her husband's aphasia and recovery from it. As I drove into the Target parking lot the women were still talking, and I hadn't heard any names of books or people yet, so I sat in the car a little longer, digging around in my purse to find a tiny black notebook to write in.
Half of my love for the Franchise Doctor Who is the TARDIS. The TARDIS is the Robin to The Doctor's Batman.
Finally, I jumped up, ready to do battle. Unfortunately, I couldn't think of a single weapon that would be useful while he held the upper ground. I did consider getting the broom from the pantry, but that would require leaving my reconnaissance post, and that would have been completely unacceptable. After all, who would be left to guard my bedroom doorway if I went AWOL? We all know that a renegade spider loose in the bedroom may be the only thing worse than one loose in the bathroom. I quickly took my eyes from the enemy just long enough to perform a sweeping search of the available weaponry, and I found a small pile of ponytail holders in reach. AHA!
The Theseus Ensemble and Geoffrey Paterson continue to further their commitment both to perform challenging new music and to provide new ways for audiences to approach it, first and foremost amongst which are Paterson’s excellent spoken introductions with musical examples. Alexander Goehr’s Lyric Pieces were therefore introduced with brief comparisons between two of Schumann’s Davidsbündlertänze and two passages from Goehr’s work, which is to a certain extent built upon structures and gestures to be found in its predecessor: nothing laboured, nor indeed forbiddingly technical, but a way in for listeners who may conceivably have fretted about what to expect. Derivation and transformation, in these particular cases from the eighth and ninth Schumann pieces (both Florestan), were presented with admirable clarity, as indeed was the performance as a whole, which benefited equally from purposive command of line. Particularly striking was the echt-Romantic horn melody of the second of the six pieces, ‘Sostenuto, ma non troppo lento’, which, when joined by muted trumpet proved suggestive both in sonority and progress of Webern’s transcription from the Musical Offering (Bach’s masterpiece another Goehr favourite, perhaps far from incidentally). Trombone added an almost chorale-like impression, again furthering the sense not only of refracted Bach but Bach refracted via a refraction of German Romanticism. Stravinskian coolness from the ensemble’s woodwind offered a welcome counterpoint, in more than one sense. A sense of processional was doubtless furthered by timbral similarities with Varèse’s Octandre (the scoring is identical) and, inescapably, Symphonies of Wind Instruments. By contrast but also by connection, the liveliness of the third piece, both as work and performance, put me in mind of a more Germanic Pulcinella. The near-hypnotic repetitions of the fifth piece – already contextualised by that piano excerpt from the sixth Schumann piece – were heightened by intensification, again both in work and performance; this is no mere repetition, as Paterson’s keen rhythmic sense made clear. Indeed, there was a true spirit of the dance, both delightful and threatening. Echoes of the boisterous good spirits of Schoenberg’s First Chamber Symphony, surely a contender for the most life-affirming work of the twentieth century, were to be heard in the closing ‘Scherzando’, also possessed of an eloquent, wonderfully grainy bassoon soliloquy from Rosie Burton.
Thing number 4.
So last week I felt that my blog really wasn’t up to scratch. This is not a call to let me know how wonderful you thought it was, I simply felt in my heart that It was far from the standard I would have liked it to be. I feel I lost a bit of the purpose of the blog.
How about a masculine card today!! I am still using the backgrounds I created with ink sprays and Crafters Workshop Templates. See my tutorial here. I used Blockheads Stamps for my project. Here is my masculine card.
I woke on Saturday morning quite breathless and light headed and didn't put up much resistance when Mark said he was taking me to A & E.
The dome of Salute dominates major portions of Venice's skyline. If you visit the city you feel like you have been to Salute. It is easily seen from the canal and many of the higher spots in the city.
Would you like to tread the boards in your wedding gown? If you could marry anywhere, where would you choose?
One member of an anti-immigration party in Britain stated that to be called racist in 21st-century Britain is “the same as being branded a witch in the Middle Ages.” He’s probably right, which means that anti-racism has quite literally become a modern witch-hunt.
Look for your tpt gift certificate in your email inbox, lovely ladies.
I had my 12 week appointment and ultrasound yesterday. I am happy to report that we have a very bouncy little baby on our hands! Pooh looked like he/she was having a party. The cutest part was the trampoline bounce that little Pooh was doing every few minutes, baby was literally bouncing off the walls of my uterus :) I love it!!!
Thomas E. Hynes, 28, Norwalk, Conn.
I’ve always thought it was cool the way health professionals can tell things about you just by feeling you up… it’s almost like a really creepy form of fortune-telling.
To have a clean fridge.
I feel like it’s been off for so long that it’s practically off the air. But the wedding shows were great, a delightful conclusion to Jim and Pam’s romance. I have to wonder where they will be going with the show in the future. The whole being bought out thing defies common sense, but the cast is still top notch.
we had already planned on going out to my parents that day anyway, so we left for their house after the vet. on the way out, my mom calls me and said she had called friends or ours wanted to bless us with a new puppy.
Urtica dioica ,also known as Stinging Nettle, has been sustainably Wild-Harvested here from Honey Bee Holistic's Farm in the valley of the Cascadian Mountains of the Pacific Northwest.
- "i love you" from my Niece
Do you have specific techniques you use to develop the plot and stay on track?
Have you ever thought about the concept of war? For some of my readers this may hit a little too close to home, but for those of us who haven’t experienced it except for what is on TV, lets meditate on this for a moment.
October: all over.’
forth."
Great Read Elekk – 500 gold + 5 Champion’s Seals
I recently made this for dessert when we had some new neighbors over and we all enjoyed it. Next time however, if I am planning on making this for entertaining purposes, I'll give it that extra day in the fridge so as to allow it to hit it's maximum taste potential.
Even the Psychiatric Association got in on the politicking this week, without looking at the details of the case, they issued a statement saying that proper procedure had been followed…then we find out on Friday that Cheryl Miller, who had been sitting at her desk writing a letter was detained under the section of the act that refers to people found wandering on roads and highways. I can only assume from this that Tower D does lean onto Wrightson Road.
Article after article talked about the shrinking book market, the death of the midlist author (or indeed any author not already a best-seller) and the impossibility of making any kind of living from writing for any but the most successful celeb.
This short account, I hope, will offer us a chance to think about what happened in Europe twenty years ago. I hope it will remind us that war is an evil and brutal act, and that all around the planet people are killing and being killed, and for what? While the reasons may essentially be different, the overall goals are the same; to take and hold power for the betterment of one’s own greed.
Not to mention I married an ex-video game fanatic... I say ex because he finds much less time these days to sneak away and indulge in his improvement of hand/eye coordination. However, the kiddos are big fans of the Wii they got from their generous gram and gramps, so the games started building up there too.
Bubonic.
On this blog I have tried to touch some of the aspects to this theory, but ultimately I have found it extremely difficult to cover what I initially intended to investigate. This evolution topic is so broad and diverse, that covering the topic fully is beyond the scope of a simple blog website. Besides which the scientists who analyse evolution and write books/articles about it, are much smarter than I am. They are professors who have multiple PH.D’s in their respective fields of science.
15. Utah Jazz
Currently the DT are busy trying to think up so fabulous challenges for you to enjoy in the future.
I hope, I hope, I hope my program is still open.
Who needs magic mushrooms?
Let us look at the Tokoloshe first.
Today is my first day of guest designing with the wonderful ladies at Humbug Hall. One of the reasons I love their challenge site is they always come up with interesting little twists. This week was no exception. They challenged us to use... Glitter. Have I mentioned how much I HATE glitter. I tend to ban it from my craft room. It truly doesn't matter what you do, you end up with glitter EVERYWHERE.
314 5. “In re Antonin Scalia.” Perspectives in Political Science, vol. 28, pp. 22-27 (1999). (Sources: Items D-IV/7/1997 and D-VIII/28/1997, below, Item C-1997(2), above.)
said that wasn’t true. Something inside pushed me to keep moving, like an ant
It’s an interesting study in contrasts isn’t it? On one side: lies, hyperbole, and false outrage defended and compounded for days on end; on the other: a careful analysis of the situation, a reasonable (if somewhat unnecessary) apology and a careful restating of the thesis.
I'm continually surprised at how many people don't understand the three-fifths compromise in the original U.S. Constitution, usually describing it somewhat like Cord Jefferson does: "the three-fifths compromise, in which the government decided that black slaves were subhuman." The clear implication here that the Constitution codified a black slave was worth only 60% of a normal human, because they didn't count as much as "free Persons" in establishing proportional representation in the House.
The slippery jack has spongy gills underneath. To prepare slippery jacks for eating, pull away and remove the sponge, discard the stem and peel the top skin. The slimy cap may cause stomach upsets if not peeled. You will be left with a thin white "fillet" which can then be sliced and pan-fried with butter and garlic.
Suddenly you see them, again. Really see them. Eyes shining, arms clasped around one another, one of them grinning and the other one gazing at the camera with wide, wise eyes. Two different personalities, perfectly captured. They're yours, and they are amazing.
The literature is divided. On the one hand, stopping goods not released in the EU market and not presenting risk of fraudulent diversion amounts to a violation of the territoriality principle and hinders legitimate trade; on the other hand, there is the risk that counterfeiters need only to declare a good in external transit in order to sell their goods in the EU. The issue has also been made even more relevant by the case of generic drugs coming from India and directed to Brazil, where they were fully legitimate, but stopped by Dutch authorities because they infringed patent rights in the Netherlands. The nature of the goods, a second-line HIV/AIDS medication for patients awaiting them urgently, made this debate highly relevant and the consistency of EU law with the Trade-related aspects of Intellectual Property Rights (TRIPS) agreement was discussed at the World Trade Organization. Finally, the issue is discussed within the process of revision of Regulation 1383/2003 (proposal COM (2011) 285).
“Jamie…that was your grandmother. Your grandfather just passed away.”
The next day I had to make a trip to Spotlight to buy some new batting and new backing, this time I used thin cotton batting. Later that night after fixing a few funny seams and making my quilt sandwich, I was ready to start quilting. I had never been able to do a neat meandering stitch before, so I had always stuck to doing a loopy pattern. Unfortunately it didn't go so well to start with, but I soon found myself doing the meandering stitch I had always wanted to do but couldn't. I only planned to make a start, but I found the entire quilt quilted that night.
So not expecting a response, I asked the @GMUWashPost Twitter why, and here's the conversation. GW fan Sean Rose got into the act too.
Julio Iglesias / older lesbian trying to look young
skunk road kill.
WHERE: Bartle Hall Convention Center
Hi all my lovelies how are you all? Yes its me I'm back.......see you just cant get rid of me lol. I'm so sorry for being MIA I've been extremely ill & stuck in bed & not up to using laptop or anything.............my copics I'm sure have cobwebs on them I've never neglected them for this long before. I am back on my feet now altho still feeling weak but I've also been diagnosed with a couple of things so I need to adjust to a new living style so to speak I shall not bore you all with details tho. I've still got more tests to have but I'm just glad to be out of bed. I have to say thank you to my totally fantastic hubby who has looked after me so well............he really is a total gem & the love of my life. He did offer bed baths but you know men...........yes indeedly doo..........naughty boy lol. When I did feel well enough to feel like using my laptop the darn thing had broke on me, thankfully I back everything up on a weekly basis on a portable external hard-drive so I dont lose anything if the unexpected happens.......phew!!! So hubster brought me a new laptop & I go & pick the one that PC World didnt have in stock.............yep thats me!! I'm totally excited about having it & just kept stroking it yesterday, I've gone girly & had a pink Sony Vaio, its my first ever brand new laptop I've always brought my sons & Craig new laptops & then I've just had their hand-me-downs lol. So I'm so excited about having a brand new all for me so yes its getting lots of strokes at the moment lol.
The man said, "Let me go; it’s daybreak." Jacob said, "I’m not letting you go ’til you bless me." The man said, "What’s your name?" He answered, "Jacob."
P.S. Why am I calling it “Computer Science”? What’s the difference between CS and IT?
I like the point that Cousar makes concerning the message of the Christ hymn. He states:
On to the pics!
thursday was all about the museum.
Enjoy and CRAFT ON!!
When I walked out yesterday, a couple approached me, asked if I was a bird spotter, it makes a change because normally, you wouldn’t see me walking around with my camera, I prefer the quieter, off the beaten track places. Lately, I’ve been trying to mingle a little, get out into more local places. I love street photography, I like to look back in years to come and remember where I’ve trodden.
"Sugar Baby" is probably the album's most musically straightforward tune; from here Amidon & Co. complicate the rhythms, melodies, countermelodies, and song structures, taking them further and further away from their origins. The contrast between a song like "Sugar Baby" and the subsequent track, the enigmatic and darkly propulsive "Little Johnny Brown", is much like the gaping contrast between past renditions of these songs and Amidon's. More often than not, the ancient folk songs Amidon is covering have rarely before even been paired with instruments, a notable example being "O Death", a morbid acapella poem famously sung by Ralph Stanley on the O Brother Where Art Thou? soundtrack. Therefore Amidon's compositions, which feel natural and lived-in, are all the more breathtaking for their having been ignited from either nothing or from something radically different. "Little Johnny Brown" is as stunning a testament as any, a series of words originally taken from a children's singing game by Ella Jenkins in the 1960's that become unsettling and almost demonic as they are looped and overlapped by Amidon towards the end of the track like a perverse equivalent of "Ring Around the Rosy", all while piano cadences and bizarrely percussive snaps and clicks circulate around Amidon's central guitar part.
34 51 14.80 N , 136 6 19.45 E
Shapeshift - Dels
Now we all know that men and women view sex differently. But either women don't misbehave as often or they are a hell of a lot better at covering their tracks! Because you rarely hear about a well-known woman's indiscretions unless it is in relation to some influential man's "urges".
As long as you can get your kinetic energy moving away from the Earth equal to this potential energy at infinity, you can escape. Seven miles per second is the oft-quoted figure because that velocity provides a body with enough kinetic energy to be equal to the difference in potential energy between Earth's surface and an object at infinity.
garlic (I used 3 cloves)
I have been creating all sorts of cakes recently with children at the OKCMOA to celebrate the new exhibition, Poodles & Pastries (and other important matters): New Paintings by Franco Mondini-Ruiz. We are taking inspiration from his paintings and sculptures to create our own unique works using different mediums.
one who seemed depressed or
Lost in bright darkness, my love is failing.
Otherwise, the only slightly unusual event to occur lately revolves around the new carpet that’s being installed at the Academy. No, really… Amazingly, the installers actually lift the pods (cubicles), install the carpet, and set the pods back down. The row where I sit is a four-deep/two-wide row of connected pods, but except for my water bottle lying on its side on my desktop, the fact that I had to turn my computer back on, and of course the new carpet, you’d never know anyone had been there.
Thanks for looking-a marathon day! You should see the state of my dining room table! Will tidy it up in the morning! Off to watch Take Me Out now and have some tea :)
I also received a donation of more quilt tops so I plan to spend some time quilting and finishing them into quilts to donate.
*Satisfying work/ Occupation
Brewed: 05-27-2009
He or she must be able to analyze business objectives of the stakeholder and develops solutions to meet their business. Strong technical skills, business intelligence, and must be able a fully understand the needs of the customer. Analyze, and documents business requirements and delivers throughout the project life cycle. Implements back office and web based systems and procedures for the overall Business strategies. Work with cross-functional teams to build out the rolling forecasting, reporting & analysis capabilities of the financial forecasting system. Assist in the development and analysis of revenue forecasting, modeling and ROI analysis.
plastic sewing needle
If you teach and can get away for a term or two, go for it! Apply!
ET: That’s right. Living in that way is the beginning of the end of the world
*Originally posted February 2009
Hello everyone and Happy May 1st! This is my favorite month of the year (and not just because it's my birthday month...and DT Mindy's too)! I love the warmer spring weather that we get on the East Coast in May before the heat and humidity of summer set in. This month Becca has designed a fabulous sketch for us all to work with for May's challenge--it was really fun to use. Below are the DT cards for inspiration and also the details on how you can join in! So go get inky!
Hosting your dear teacher/friend for cake.
Being very careful to keep my opinions to myself as I did so.
225 gr. gerieberner Kaese (optional)
mr. curry and i were thinking he might go On The Road (thanks JK for the lifetime of not being able to say that without thinking of you) and make Much More Money but after going over the negatives of this in my mind and with a girlfriend at coffee (shoutout Stephanie!) i realized that my husband would be living off of soda, water, burgers and tacos, in addition to sleeping in strange hours for odd amounts of time, and then two weeks of this later come home to me and four kids. no. not so much. next idea.
Then he started talking about his dad. How his dad’s dad committed suicide when his dad was 9. And his dad was on a course to chemical dependency that would take him well into adulthood. How Steven became a Christian at 16 and wanted so much for his dad to find Jesus to.
The Cove
I was devastated and burst into tears.
Second, know what decision you are asking someone to make. What information is needed to make that decision? Keep that data, and strip out the rest. Throw the backup data in an appendix if you must.
An excerpt from "The Waking"
With a mixer, cream butter and shortening together. Add sugar, a little at a time. Add eggs, 1 at a time, beating after each addition. Stir dry ingredients together in a bowl and add to mixer alternately with milk, starting with the flour and ending with the flour. Mix in vanilla. Pour into a greased and floured tube pan and bake for 1 to 1 1/2 hours, until a toothpick inserted in the center of the cake comes out clean.
blah blah blah german german german, admit her, blah blah german, surgery
*salt and freshly ground black pepper, to taste
If you want honesty, adopt the habit of listening before you state your opinion. Instead of starting a conversation with “I think we should …” ask your team members “What do you think?” Withhold your opinion until you have heard theirs. They just might change your mind.
The day Joe Ray hangs his coat up which says fast food fun. Till tomorrow, deli of the day is nice tomorrow at MacDonald’s…
“I would be surprised if that were to occur,” Pinsky said.
Narrator is "just more comfortable with a clipboard." Her own words.
But it does tell us more than just how much RIM wants apps, lots of apps (and decent ones at that) for the phone.
The path to a rich life is relatively simple – trust in God to provide us with what we need and then be willing to share what we have been given with others. OK – it might result in a lower standard of living than either what we’d like or our neighbours enjoy, but is a lifestyle where we’re constantly trying to keep up with others really that fulfilling?
Q: You point out a number of inconsistencies and, in your estimation, absurdities that have been perpetuated since the 1982 and
Fifth Falls sign
Cake – Audrey’s Fine Baked Goods (Sayville, NY)
Ellie bounded out the door after her, running through the snow with her nose down. The snow sprayed in every direction as Ellie pushed through it. When she finally stopped and looked up, Emily laughed to see all the snow on Ellie's face. She had a white snow beard with white snow hair on top of her head.
yat-pāda—whose lotus feet; sevā—service; abhiruciḥ—inclination; tapasvinām—persons undergoing severe penances; aśeṣa—innumerable; janma—birth; upacitam—acquire; malam—dirtiness; dhiyaḥ—mind; sadyaḥ—immediately; kṣiṇoti—destroys; anvaham—day after day; edhatī—increasing; satī—being; yathā—as; pada-aṅguṣṭha—the toes of His lotus feet; viniḥsṛtā—emanating from; sarit—water.
I hummed along quietly and then, when I felt A growing restless, I became more enthusiastic. I tried one handed motions, dramatic head bobbing, cheery voices. It worked intermittently.
Here is a picture of it totally open laying flat so you can see better the full design:
When he died, his unique story punctuated by the unusual disposition of his remains earned him a major piece in The New York Times. They reported that his mother had covered his eyes that night in the rescue boat, presumably to spare him from the sights we all know from James Cameron’s movie, such as the stern of the great ship rising in the air before sinking into the frigid depths, and Leonardo DiCaprio turning blue. They also reported that, according to his widow, he found it difficult to talk about the experience when he started to give speeches, around the time I knew him, but it got easier for him as time went on.
In 1982, he made his last really big hit with Victor/Victoria, earning Andrews an Oscar nomination as best actress. More than a decade later, he tried his hand at turning it into a Broadway musical with terrible results.
Part 3 Editing yourself – Listening to your writing
Location: Baltic States, Jantarny, Russia
Thurs (K yoga)
Oh think again....
The tourist replied, "15 to 20 years."
Mileage: 48,000 km
the present decay of eastern Europe.
~ And just hanging out at the pool , reading or swimming and just having the best time with my kids!!
“She got a little freaked out,” his head hanging low. “She decided it was too much, too fast, too soon and ended it. I had to find this place quick as she didn’t want me in her house…. So, here I am…. I need to get rid of some stuff. It isn’t too much this time.”
2 doors
I am very excited to announce the return of my TV show Passion in Action. Our goal is to equip and inspire you to be a Christ-centered, Spirit-led, purpose-driven change agent who understands your role in advancing the Kingdom of God in the marketplace and the world. The main focus of this season will be on bringing a relevant biblical perspective to on-going issues related to the economy, entrepreneurship, employment, and other connected topics that impact families and communities.
What made Wooden such a great leader, coach, and mentor? Bill Walton (who played for Wooden at UCLA) told a story years ago about how Wooden walked the freshmen into the locker room his first practice at UCLA and taught the players how to put their shoes and socks on -
Talk about getting goosebumps! I was Fer-Reaking out! I mean, what are the odds that I’m sitting directly in front of this book at this particular moment only to find that this particular author on this particular day shares this particular interview containing this particular bit of information pertaining to said book? This is no joke!
Written by Twisted Ideas
Chris looked at Ann, then David. “And what if it doesn’t work?”
Can I say to all my blogging buddies that you
Thanks for visiting and check back for an Evan page coming soon!
It was a really great week! Everything but flashlight was one trip to one store! I only went to one other store this week and all I got there was the flashlight!
all we can really say is thank you.
After one season of 16 one hour episodes, ABC cancelled the series in 1974. But, the public was fixated on Six Million Dollar Man and Wonder Woman, so the network decided to revive the Super Friends in 1976, editing the original episodes into 30 minutes episodes and rebroadcasting the series again.
I do get the advantages of business networking, sharing ideas and sounding out others on various topics. I do get the thrill of breaking news disseminating so quickly and effectively.
36. Pixie And Dixie
1 unlimited
I stared at him for a few seconds, then asked, "Is that funny?" I get so sick of people who think the slightest bit of southern accent represents ignorance, incest, etc. That is very much the way it is in California. Most of these people have never been to the South, and certainly haven't spent enough time there to have a clue about the people or the culture.
It was still a bit icy and with yesterday's rain there was a lot of water coming over the dam. This dam has been here for centuries but there's a movement starting in town to have it removed to make fish passage easier and hopefully restore our anadromous fish run. Studies show there's bedrock just upstream of the dam and without the impediment there would be a nice rapid right through town. Our house is just around the bend upstream, we could literally walk to the end of our street, jump in our kayaks and paddle the three miles out to sea. I told my daughter that I hope we can all do that someday, she smiled.
As a mom and a teacher, I live with an awareness of the teachable moment—a moment when a child or a student presents you with a drop-everything opportunity to engage with the world or an idea. When one of my readers recently expressed interest in hearing how I help my kids deal with cultural influences, this is where I landed: the teachable moment.
The undecorated princess descended from her tower and stepped into the classroom among her peers. She was already euphoric. She would finally be important.
The point is, I have less time to myself than Big Ben. It takes me about a month to read a paperback at the moment, and I have to pencil in visits to the toilet on the calendar.
But my husband was happier, and that's all that really mattered.
Listened to the TV on volume 30 and on volume 10, because little ears hear different than big ears and it's good for the big ears to be reminded of that once in a while.
Couric, that is. Charlie Gibson, Tina Fey..
Then there is bleaching cream for one’s bunghole. Yes, anal bleach. Just a few dabs a couple times per day and you too can restore your backdoor exit to its former bright and shiny glory. You’ll have to use your imagination here folks because trust me, you DO NOT want to see the photos!
Oh well, maybe next year.
04. Island Sand (3:42)
Green Ribbon Schools are an important step toward creating a new generation of environmental stewards, and OSSE is proud of the achievements these two schools have made to not only mobilize youth to take an active ownership in preserving the environmental health, sustainability and energy efficiency of their schools, but also to ensure District of Columbia students better appreciate natural green spaces and make ‘green living’ a hands-on, accessible experience – not to mention presenting new career options that previously may never have been considered.
Really?! First of all, there is nothing wrong with Alpha’s ears except her propensity for using them selectively when I am speaking to her. And secondly, as a species our ears tend to protrude from our heads in order to gather sound, so that we can hear.
I shouldn’t have to feel it’s ok to go for a walk in the park so long as there’s a bench for me to sit on.
Did you see it? It’s the lady. She’s riding horseback (sidesaddle too!), holding the baby, holding the reigns, and shooting a gun – at the same time! Oh, and might I add, looking cute doing it!
Published: April 17, 2012 (Houghton Mifflin Harcourt)
Challenging Butler, a respected auctioneer and realtor from Harned who has served in the Legislature since 1995, was an exercise in futility for the only two candidates ever to run against him.
You need to track your campaigns meticulously, only use one keyword per ad group so you can track how every keyword is performing.
That's what really hit me. Forty one people without shoes now have them. Because of us.
That said, there are still some things which trouble me. Many of these things are not fully described in the play-test packet - I do take heart that a few of the core things I was most worried about (before seeing any of the rules at all) were handled very well in the play-test packet.
Somebody call Jeff Foxworthy. I just know there's a bad redneck joke in all this somewhere...
I then punched out some butterflies from more of the scrap paper, sprayed them with Crafters Companion glitter spray and used them to link the flowers and the stamped image together.
That’s only a minute of your time… it could make a world of difference to somebody’s life!
Mod Podge
The first two dishes came out after a short wait. The fried rice with crispy baby anchovies is one of my favourite comfort food. It’s hard to make a good plate of fried rice though. This one has lots of wok hei (roasty flavour imparted by a wok at extremely high temperatures) and the rice was moist and fluffy. The fried bee hoon or rice vermicelli was quite basic but it was good.
I’m back again for two Beer Dinners in June, one as a fundraiser for the Myrniong Primary School which is the OTHER building in Myrniong apart from the pub and I can’t wait. Why don’t you join me? They love welcoming folk from the Big Smoke.
The heads of all the patients in the waiting room snapped around, to look at the very embarrassed man.
Vampyr focuses on traveling journalist Allan Gray, who while visiting a small village notices some seriously strange goings-on. Some of the villagers are deformed. There are strange noises that other people won’t acknowledge. Strangest of all, peoples’ shadows don’t always stay in sync with their bodies, and sometimes even go off wandering on their own.
In Congress, H.R.3630, the Middle Class Tax Relief and Job Creation Act of 2011, includes a provision that would require those seeking unemployment benefits to meet minimum education requirements in addition to work search requirements. To meet these requirements, an individual would need to have earned a high school diploma or GED credential or other State-recognized equivalent. If one doesn’t have such a credential, he/she would need to be enrolled and making satisfactory progress in classes leading to a diploma, GED or its equivalent. Under the bill, which has passed the House, these requirements can be waived by states if they are deemed to be unduly burdensome.
Jason D. Cayne, 32, Morganville, N.J.
I was inspired to share some of my new affirmations.
In Germany, on the other hand, the cashier will acknowledge your existence with a simple Hallo or Grüß Gott (depending on the region). After that, the only sound you hear for awhile is beep, beep, beep as your items pass over the scanner. Then cashier’s voice resumes: €32.85 bitte. You hand over the money, she mutters how much change you get back, and then throws in a hasty Schönen Tag or Tschüß. And that’s it. No superficial small-talk, no fake smiles. Just another efficient transaction of food acquisition.
But I don't need to know how,
We now have a spooky stalker for Linden, which ended with Linden and son asking to stay at Holder’s place. He didn’t question why. As expected, Stan not being Rosie’s blood father was no big deal, he knew before she was born and brought her up as his own. Rosie’s mum spent a lot of time with the teenage runaway / possible prostitute, before getting robbed by her. There was a letter in what was presumable Rosie’s box stating she, or someone was two months pregnant. I got a bit lost with that.
And yet, life always has a card up its sleeve.
Haque, of Mace Street, Bethnal Green, east London, and Choudhury of Hunton Street, Spitalfields, east London, both plead not guilty to one count each under section five of the Public Order Act.
Long time since I’ve written a line in here, so time to add some more stuff about… Cambridge, also today’s topic. As promised, here’s a small explanation about the formal dinners in Cambridge.
Supper:
There were other episodes where Sam the Sheepdog would clock in, carrying his lunch box and the coyote would clock out. I think that’s how it went. Yosemite Sam probably had a stroke and died. He was always pissed off. I think my least favorite was Porky Pig, the stutterer. ”That..that…that’s all folks…”And Elmer Fudd, who needed extensive speech therapy. I bet little kids that were having problems with their r’s and l’s cried when they watched him. “Shhh! Be verwee verwee qwhy-et. I’m shooting wabbits.”
Fact is, there is strength in numbers and there are over seventy-million gun owners in America. If even a fourth of us were members of NRA or GOA or whatever, videos like this one would not exist.
After all, you should be planning on doing this for the rest of your life.
Homeschooling parents have a knack for facilitating learning. They are willing to step out of the box to help their children understand. Sometimes you have to learn with them. Parent at the Helm knows that the key to homeschooling success is that Homeschooling Parents are INVOLVED Parents.
Seau’s mother appeared before reporters, weeping uncontrollably.
a time to be born and a time to die,
#2 i've gained all of you! seriously, getting to know all of you has been a grand experience and one that i hope to continue
Washing at their identity.
flash. Sometimes having someone who has a distinctive sound doesn't
By deciding that I am no kind of Mom, no particular kind at all, I declare myself free of the need to beat myself up for the mistakes of the past (and the present, and the future). I can proclaim without guilt or shame that yes, I, a parent who believes in the best possible nutrition for her children and all children, used formula to feed my infants — and it didn’t define us. I didn’t give up on myself; I kept moving forward, kept evolving, and with each bite of food I’ve set before them I have learned more about what I personally believe to be right and true about the feeding relationship that works.
Everything changes when we get saved. We don’t stop living in the world. We can never do that. We can’t shut ourselves out of it. We can only say that’s who we used to be, but thanks to the blood of Jesus Christ, we are redeemed and are new beings in Christ.
I'm probably a tad overexcited about the boots, considering I've never owned rain boots before. You see, back in Boston, I worked outside the city - so a rainy day meant bolting from my apartment to the car, from the car to the office and then back again. Here, I'm avoiding my car like the plague (you know - steep hills, sparse parking - I'd rather walk). One of my first orders of action in San Francisco was to get a pair of rain boots. Of course, then there was beautiful weather for the last few weeks (again, not complaining), so this has been my first opportunity to wear them. Now I just need some of those fun tall socks and I'll be in business.
Paneer : 50 grams - Chopped
Sorry there's so many but wanted to show all sides ;o) I really urge you to give this a try if you haven't already, if I can do it anyone can. I am giving the large box to my mum for mother's day so I have lined it with some velvet sticky back paper.
Dig in haste, repent at leisure seems to be the yard-stick for creating Walditch’s mini Spaghetti Junction. The operation included a new drainage ditch on Mr Morris’s land behind the re-sited hedge.
1414 *D0II/16/2002. “Bush v. Gore and a Proper Separation of Powers.” Bush v. Gore Conference, Loyola University of Chicago Law Journal, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2002(5), above.) See Item C-2002(4), above.
– which takes place in June this year – where world leaders will (it is hoped) seize the opportunity to set human development on a new, more sustainable path.
For not realizing you were my all
(And let's not get crazy, we're simply talking about a return to Clinton era tax rates. Last time I checked, the wealthy did pretty well for themselves back in the 90's.)
Sometimes, during the gray morning hours when I can´t sleep, I imagine him still out there, speaking to our shadows. Maybe it´s true, in some time. But I don´t think about these things too much, I don´t own the truth or the time, I´m not entitled.
Apple is hugely popular in the Asian nation, where die-hard fans have been known to line up for days to get their hands on the latest offerings from the US giant.
Shopping at Dnipro was so much fun. There is a large selection of cookies, teas, canned goods, spices, and other foods from Croatia, Israel, Poland, Ukraine, Russia, and other Eastern European countries and just scanning the colorful packaging and Cyrillic lettering is a graphic design treat. Most all packages I saw had ingredients lists in English, which is essential when shopping gluten-free and overall, I thought the prices were quite modest.
FOX announced today that it's pulling the plug on Alcatraz. Crap in a hat! I discussed my feelings about the first season in an earlier post, so I won't dredge them up again. Let's just say I had high hopes for the show (since it was sort of a cousin of LOST) but was profoundly disappointed with how it played out.
First, there were the posts by Dorie Greenspan and David Leibovitz (can I please have their lives??) about kouign amann. No, this pastry/cake (depending how you want to look at it) is neither upside down nor a pudding. But it has same gooeyness that covers your tongue and sticks to your teeth and the same heft that feels like a happy bullet in your gut. All kouign amann is is pastry dough, baked with copious amounts of butter and sugar so that the butter and sugar do their chemical magic and caramelize and congeal and make it sweet and sticky.
Out of breath, super hot and exhausted, I manage to make my way back out and sit on the outside corner for a couple. I was clearly under gunned that day but managed to get a couple.
The nursery owner seemed tickled by us when we referred to our "dead peach tree bed". So much so GG got her rock for 1/2 its price. I think he was also impressed that she casually heaved the 120 lb. boulder into the back of the truck by herself.
Fruit & Vegetables
- I went snorkeling in underground caves (my personal fave moment.)
And then having the courage and conviction to work out what we need to do to hit the Green One!
Leicester Kyle / Bridge to the Sea / 165
Life has been really good this summer. Then June came. haha We had a lot of rain come down earlier this month and it ended up flooding the shopping strip that one of the salons are in. We were down for a day but that is lucky considering some business are still closed.
Drum Roll, please.........
We didn’t have to ask God to take our troubles from us and carry them on His shoulders. This is something He offered. He doesn’t go back on words that He’s spoken.
Recently there was a buzz that a fibre maker Shandong Helon was about to default, but the latest news is – it will pay back some CPs which were due.
"Sorry, but I am staying away from change," I told them.
So if you’ve watched the trailers to this movie and thought it looked cool and can spare the money for the tickets, then I don’t think anything should stop you. Visually the movie is good, it’s a step up from the original, and yet there is no drive to make it any better than competent. Any interesting interaction between actors is quickly diverted by the plot. There could have been something great here, with it’s themes but it’s never taken advantage of. You really don’t need my recommendation for this movie, cause you’ll know if you want to see it from the get go.
Brodsky chairs the Assembly Standing Committee on Corporations, Authorities and Commissions, which held the hearing with three other committees.
Review copy provided by NIS America
If President Obama really wanted to have some fun last night during the State of the Union speech, he should have, at some point, raised his hands above his head and called out “Praise to Allah!”. Every Republican in there would have stood up screaming “I knew it!! I knew it!!!” Rush Limbaugh would have died of a coronary.
So instead of the confit de canard and the multi-layered cakes I had been envisioning, here is a recipe for a cake that is the essence of the sunny Mediterranean at its simplest. Olive oil, lemon zest, Greek yogurt. I have been seeing this recipe bouncing from blog to blog in different versions lately and admit my curiosity was piqued. What would a cake made with the lovely Tuscan extra virgin olive oil I have taste like?
Way down in Mexico you went out to find a doctor and you never came back
Fortunately, I've really enjoyed the non-fiction books I've read recently. I have a big list in general, but I'm also looking forward to Spring Break at home with no schedule, no agenda, and with Amanda off on a mission trip, Kyle and I will truly just be able to chill, so I'm hoping for vacation-level reading!
If we are to understand that the goal of education, for the president of RBI, is to supply workers, then our current system of education has been very successful, very profitable for business owners.
American and Japanese scientists say they have found elevated levels of radioactive cesium throughout a 150,000 square kilometer area of the Pacific Ocean off Japan.
A thinly disguised supremacist organisation aligned along racial lines. I think they are no different than that other bunch of misguided folks in Hindraf which has splintered into many different shards, each with an agenda.
I will draw a winner a week from today, and if you happen to be that lucky winner, I'll contact you.
What I did not like -
The scan will be later rather than sooner I'm told. So I'm put into a bed. One night comes and goes. No scan.
H - And before that we have to finish the comic, of course! After receiving our editorial critique in December, we managed to make a good start on the third draft by reinstating the 'Q and A' characters, before flu and the holidays interrupted our work. Then we began this year by making sure that all the technical requirements are in place for the printers: that we have the right size areas for live, bleed and trim (whatever they are), etc...
You are getting your child ready to go to the childminders house. You realise there no clean knickers in the drawer. You put her dress on and decide you will grab her a clean pair from the laundry basket when you are back downstairs.
With Mercury having a high coefficient of thermal expansion, the patent suggests using a relief valve emptying into another chamber is used to ensure the system has a constant volume of fluid.
1 Teaspoon Coarsely Ground Black Pepper
back up to our house every day.
Crawley fans however you can now be our friends sorry for any bad feelings towards you nothing personal we hope you understand. Having appointed Steve Coppell as manager it looks as though Reds fans will be accepted by the rest of us. Well maybe from next season anyway personally id like them to fall short of automatic promotion this year and allow Torquay to go up but that’s just me.
There's no doubt that this is just the first day of the rest of Catherine's life and I'm sure you will be hearing more from her in the future. Meanwhile, you can get a sneaky preview of her Jack Brenin series of books here.
She has this thing with chairs. I dont know what it is, but I guess she just likes to play with them. At therapy they have a few kid sized chairs and she does the same kind of stuff. Tonight Kaia lined them all up in a row and she was going from one to the next sitting down and Kaia would tip her out of them. They had a blast.
Hebrews 4:14-16
Importantly, I don't just believe, I know for an absolute certainty; that silly stupid inaccuracies about guns in pop culture, are a large portion of the cause of the silly stupid laws and regulations made around guns; said laws and regulations mostly written by, and voted for by, people who don't know any better.
As soon as I hit the stand with my avatar, I entered the limbo zone – Second Life tended to throw me either deep underwater, or into some mythical sky, where somebody’s lost prims of hats and shoes floated by me. I logged off, and back in again, hoping like heck that my clothes came back in with me – often they don’t when high lag affects a setting. For a while I stood there, literally (virtually) naked on the stage, without my animations or my hair for that matter. Then slowly the sound and other visuals returned.
Been WICKED slack on posting and thought I should get back on the train. The way this works is I post a devotional thought per week (and other thoughts daily) and then we discuss and share. If you want to be a guest blogger, e-mail me at CFletcher@mannachurch.org with your post you would like me to consider.
Doctor Who Magazine Special Edition
Yet, just like juicing, my previous cleanse required SOME protein without any additives whatsoever and 90% vegetable intake. Either cleanse requires fiber as an additive to help cleanse the body. The fiber we eat mostly comes from dairy and carbs which a cleanse has none of. So do I just spend three or four days eating nothing but fresh fruit and vegetables? That certainly seems to be far more appealing to the idea of feeling full. Or perhaps a combination?
I was looking forward to her next adventure, as was my mother, apparently. When I brought Lady Emily #5 home from the library, my mother stole it and began reading it. She then proceeded to spoil it by declaring she already knew who the murderer was and shouting from the opposite end of the house “It’s X! It’s X!” She can be quite aggravating sometimes. Consequently, when I was finally able to ready Lady Emily #5 myself, much of the joy had been lost. Lesson learned: when Lady Emily #6 is published, I shall hide it from mama until I have read it myself. Hmmph.
Lauren ? Lauren
Showing dogs has taught me deal with arbitrary rules and regulations. Dog show can be rules are pretty silly an useless. In a particular draft dog test, a dog can fail an entire test for moving their feet during the greet a stranger exercise. Yes, a dog could simply fail for shuffling their feet. Seems silly, but rules are rules. In competitive obedience, the handler is only allowed to give the dog one command. No where in practical life would you only give a dog a single command, but again, those are the rules. In dog shows, changing rules and regulations takes years, and by the time a rule has been changed, your dog has passed prime show time. I typically follow rules I don't agree with, but as is life.
Finish: Amberley Station TQ026118
First of all, I would have written earlier, but I couldn't remember where it was you went to actually start a new post. (Thank you, Blogger). So after I figured out that I didn't want to do it in Arabic or Czech, I finally figured out, 'Oh! It is this stupid looking orange pencil thingy!'.
“Did everyone come to the dance on time that they didn’t see this woman pouring salt?-Me
From asthma, which has nearly claimed her life. From her parents, who will do anything to keep that from happening. From delectably dangerous Asher, who is smothering her from the inside out.
The legal team representing the Opposition to Urban Tolling Alliance and others convinced Judge Bill Prinsloo that he should treat the case against tolling as urgent. Had the judge ruled that the matter was not urgent, the case would have been thrown out of court.
"That thing you said about New York in that movie has really stayed with me." I told him about my relationship, as a fellow Southerner, with the city, and told him I had had my ass kicked, and that I hoped to return there one day, and that his words about the city still inspired me. "Well," he said, "it's a helluva town, and you need to make your way back up here, if you feel that way."
First, I was given this gorgeous (and hilarious) vintage cat salt shaker and matching milk jug. Yes. Milk pours out of the cat's mouth.
Saying “maybe” in Argentina: Quizás and tal vez are not often used in Argentina to say maybe. Here are the more common words used:
Or maybe it’s time for me to stop buying cheap eyeliner from CVS/Target… Haha, anyway, I’m off to bed now! Hopefully I can do the lip tint review tomorrow if I’m not too busy! Good night.
Can officials soften the blow? CDS’ are currently pricing in a 36% chance that Spain defaults. It will grow in the days ahead. The ECB and IMF are on the run and are looking for handouts and support from the larger IMF donors like Japan and the United states. The IMF is going to have a hard time getting funding and the US’ piggy bank is not unlimited.
I've been a little MIA for a while. I guess that's what life and kids do to you! I've just had a lot on my plate and didn't really feel the need to lay it all out here. Then life hit us again and we lost my grandfather yesterday. He would have been 98 in April. Amazing isn't it? I guess it's in the genes so I'll be living for quite a while, wow! A week ago He had taken a fall and broken his hip. He had surgery and things seemed to go smoothly, until he got pneumonia. My father said that when he took his last breath he looked like a young man. He seemed so peaceful and happy!
A very wise man said to me, "The only problem with this dish is that there won't be any leftovers." I couldn't agree more. We did, after all, eat it like candy.
could be on fire again,
One of the advantages of traditional employment that self-employment tends to lack is division of labor. In a traditional setup, you have marketers, developers, analysts, investors, financing and other departments that break up the task and allow people to get more done overall. If you’re considering going into business for yourself, it’s important that you understand this option is not necessarily going to be available to you. Sometimes several people buy into a franchise together, but by and large the individual operator is the unit of ownership.
She saw what the welfare system had done to her and how it had kept her from achieving her highest potential. She broke free of the shackles and began preaching it from the rooftops. She became president and founder of the Coalition of Urban Renewal and Education (CURE) and self-proclaimed "former welfare queen."
As a national heritage that promotes national unity in the framework of territorial integrity of the Syrian Arab Republic, the Constitution shall guarantee the protection of cultural diversity of the Syrian society with all its components and the multiplicity of its tributaries.
I guess the Quiet Voice was in place so we wouldn’t spook the GIGANTIC HOUSE CENTIPEDE WITH A BAJILLION LEGS that was furiously trying to crawl out of the stainless steel sink. Honestly, it was huge. All those legs made it look furry. Mr. Magoo could easily mistake it for a small kitten. Suprizingly my first instinct was not to smush it. Normally I would, but only because they usually come charging at me from the shower drain or behind the toilet and totally catch me off guard. It’s like a five year-old who doesn’t understand that Hide-and-Seek isn’t an all day long kind of game.
- Samuel Rowe - vocalizing (10)
In ancient cultures, illnesses and misfortune were seen as a punishment for God and/or the work of evil powers. Such affliction was believed to be a result of the sine committed by the sufferer or his or her parents. The terror of leprosy lay in the diminished physical changes that inevitably came and in the social and spiritual rejection associated with it. The leper lived apart from the community and, when encountering other people, yelled out “Unclean! Unclean!” so that others could avoid contact. Worst of all, no leper could participate in worship or join the community in any religious activities. No one had less dignity or hope than a leper.
My twelve-year old son recently came home with a bag of gooey looking green stuff -
The green paper on land reform, finally made public on 31st August 2011, is part of a new assault on the Constitution and the rule of law.
The stars hung above the churning surf. Motionless. Not like the sheets of foam that fanned across sand, then pulled back out to sea.
Adam Lambert and Allison Iraheta were right at home singing respectively Led Zeppelin's "Whole Lotta Love" and Janis Joplin's "Cry Baby". Good, strong performances by these two.
Oh yeah, the song. Well, it’s not much more than your average club jam, but I do give her some credit for not going a totally poppy route. Plus, it’s just catchy. I know, I know, we’re talking about a Lindsay Lohan song, but c’mon, it’s not that bad right?
I hope this inspires you a little bit, have a great week!
Salad or Soup? If it’s a great salad, salad, but if we’re talking your average salad and your average soup, soup. I particularly like tomato soup on rainy days like today.
Andrew: “I’ll kill you. I mean it, Siobhan, I’ll see you dead.”
we named her Six.
I am the sun on ripened grain,
This past weekend my parents joined us for the festivities. We are so happy they could be here to join in the occasion. On Saturday, when we heard Abby start waking up, my mom said she wanted to bring her a cupcake and sing happy birthday. I just happen to have one so we all went in to her room with a cupcake and candle and sang happy birthday. She couldn't have been happier! She then indulged in a cupcake for breakfast!
was a harbinger for further
Cook at 350 degrees for about 40 minutes. Allow to cool at least 20 minutes.
Umbrella- R 22,24,27 E42,43
Get up, eat, go the last valley – the one with the lakes. Again our neighbors got up and headed out before and way further than we did. But it was fine. The weather was ok with cloud cover. The lakes were beautiful azure color. There were even ducks or some sort of birds. I was wondering if there was any fish in there. The thing is that I bought that fishing license and I really wanted to use it (the license even specified the exact time when I could fish). However, at this point the food wasn’t an issue because it appeared that the group resigned to do a short trip.
According to the moppy-haired brat, he "doesn't tolerate dorkiness very well." He disapproves of his family's car choice (there's poor Dad, washing the Dodge caravan in his white socks and sandals). The boy concludes by saying, "Just because you're a parent doesn't mean you have to be lame."
I thought, if I ever have kids, I want my life to stay the same and my kids could just live around it all.
I simply MUST get stash used!!! The mess is driving me crazy.
Place 3-4 tablespoons of syrup in a tall glass. Top up with club soda.
I divided the remaining 1/4 of icing and split it into 2 bowls. One I dyed yellow, the other light purple. I used a Wilton Tip #2D. Before piping the flower on top of the cupcake, I made a few practice flowers to get a sense of the pressure to use and just how it worked in general.
This is where you, my lovely followers and readers and lurkers, come in. What is your process for plotting? What books would you recommend?
By Tim Ard, Forest Applications Training, Inc.
What is your why?
Willard White is such a compelling Vodnik that it's almost as if the role was built around him. A singer and actor of his calibre would be wasted otherwise in this role, but White makes it centre stage in every way. It's a role for which he'll always be remembered. Watch the way he moves around the other characters who cannot "see" him. It's as if he's shadowing the emotions they feel, undertanding them by moving his body in parallel to theirs. His scenes with Myrto Papatanasiu are particularly tender, but it's his shadowing of the Prince that's most touching. David Pountney's ENO Rusalka suggested unhealthy parent/child sexuality. For Herheim, the Vodnick isn't a dirty old man but a kind of noble savage, who means well but cannot escape
Waking Ned Devine (Produced by Glynnis Murray and Richard Holmes)
I love adding a little detail to everything. If you are like me, its the details you remember and that stick with you, especially if the object is boring and dull. This is what I thought when I walked into my bathroom one day. I looked around and noticed my toilet stuck out like a sore thumb, so I figured I would see what the wonderful world of the internet had to offer. It didn't take me long to stumble upon a very ingenious website. Toilet Tattoos is a website that offers appliques for your toilet seat!
A magician, Ma Jo Goo always does wonders with magic that leaves the viewers in awe. But this woman, Kang Yeo Ri, never seemed to give a positive reaction to his tricks, even when the crowd cheers wildly. Dumbfounded and intrigued by this particular woman, he decided to follow her. Never did he knew that, this mysterious woman, has her own gruesome history..
P.S. Stay tuned for next week’s installment, The Great Migration Part II: Planes, Trains and Anguish.
This is one healthy and delicious way of eating the sweet potatoes. You can make it complete with a fried egg (sunny side up) on top for a more balance meal. Or you can serve it with lean protein and a veggie side dish.
Sorghum Flour(Jonna Pindi) - 2 cups
and I made them!
that is your vision growing dim.
Seeking to recover from their ordeal, the group spent a week within the safety of their walls to re-assess and replace expended resources. Anselme saw to raising Leone from the dead, albeit weakened by the experience–while during the span the Usurer paid a visit to the party in regard to their continued constructions. In exchange for a sum of gold and agreement by the party to extend their walls around the camp itself, the Usurer would allow their continued work–yet Pandora plied a more private inference that the mysterious leader of the camp would not yet be placated wholly by such gestures.
10. Get Together—Youngbloods
And it's exactly what they usually DON'T get if they go to school. I am so glad my boys have had the chance to take life at their own pace, rather than being swept along in the madness and driven-ness of school and all the extra-curricular activities. I still remember the sadness I felt when watching an SBS documentary where they were trying to help a teenager who was very depressed and had been suicidal. He was having trouble sleeping, and having trouble getting up for school. They tested him and found that he had "delayed sleep phase syndrome". The solution they prescribed included light therapy etc, to try to get his body clock to be more synchronised with the hours of the school system, so he could cope with getting up for school etc. He tried the therapy for awhile but did not stick with it. At the end of the program there was a discussion with the psychologist and the boys' mother, and the comment was made that he "simply has to go to school" so they had to do whatever they could to get him through. I thought it was tragic, and I'd hate to think how they would feel if he ended up acting on his suicidal thoughts. I beg to differ about the idea that he "has to go to school". He could leave school, and live in harmony with his natural sleep patterns! I imagine they didn't realise homeschooling or unschooling was a valid option? I know that I would never make my child stay in a situation where they were depressed and suicidal because they were so chronically tired. And I am so thankful that my teenagers have been able to sleep when they're tired, and get up when they've had enough sleep. And you know what? They spent a lot of time sleeping in very late, but they're also very capable of getting up at the crack or dawn or before, if they want to go for an early surf, or if they have to be at work early, or if they just decide they want to get up earlier. No problems.
But an adult can accept that what they don't like doesn't trump someone else living their life with no real affect on their life other than their vague 'sensibilities' feeling queezy.
We will have fights, we will scream and argue
Between myself and just three key activists in Barking and Dagenham, we began the election campaign that led to the BNP’s ground-breaking result in the council elections. Come submission of nominations time, we had 21 candidates. Due to the thorough vetting and appropriate analysing of the candidates it was deemed that four were unsuitable and 13 were chosen. A further four were by one means or another indebted to the council due to disability which would have left them out of pocket if elected, which was too much of a burden to expect individuals to shoulder. Hence only 13 candidates stood and as is well known, 12 of them were elected.
Acrylic Blocks
The great thing about artists is they hear or see art in places the rest of us don’t. Like, for instance, the percussive potential of a dry cleaning shop, discovered by Diego Stocco:
To know you're never really far
Robert D. Eaton, 37, Manhasset, N.Y.
Later, Murphy rolls on his back, eyes closed and paws up. He’s telling me, as he does too often, to stop staring blankly at the computer screen and give affection where it will be handsomely returned.
Metabolism is the sum of all the chemical reactions that occur in a living cell in order to provide energy for the organism to do important things like breathing, digest food, sleep etc. There are two ways that these reactions can occur;
Here is a time-line of articles on the revolution developing in the New South Africa.
Right. So it was as easy as that!
You would think I would have caught something as significant as this with all of the different diets I have done over the years! It just goes to show you that you have to keep an eye not just on your calories, or on your water, or your exercise or the scale, but the whole picture. I'm going to try counting calories again all this week... and I can't wait to see what happens!
The theme for this was "Garden Tea Party" ... and this is what I came up with ...
Fruitcake Gymnast only got one time to do his routine most nights, ya know. No one would dance with him I am sure. But, I never saw him ask anyone else that particular night.
The decision of the Directorate General for Foundations (VGM) to restore the cemeteries to their respective minority communities is the first ruling on a February application by 19 non-Muslim foundations for the return of 57 historic properties. In September, the government authorized the return of properties seized from non-Muslim religious communities in decades past.
So I killed the caretakers, opened the door, killed the capatin, opened the secret door, went down stairs, found and slew Alexa, slew Ollix, ran through some secret doors, down the corridor, pick up the “Kill the Juggernaut” quest, slew the Juggernaut, and walked into Everling’s lab.
"Maybe you could check Facebook, see if you posted anything on those days," my boss suggested. No, I said to her, it would take way too long to go that far back to see what I had tweeted on those days in question (same with Twitter, too...because I have my Twitter feed linked up to my Facebook account). But then, after thinking about it and temporarily blaming my less-than-ideal work schedule for getting me into this mess, I was struck with inspiration: What had I blogged on or around those certain days?
with ♥ from my family to yours
has suddenly decided it wants to learn English.
I recently had my first trip to Las Vegas and it was definitely interesting! I've been wanting to go for so long and never had the opportunity. My husband has to go there frequently for business, so he doesn't see it as a vacation spot. Since it was an elusive destination for me, it obviously becomes more enticing. My husband once read a quiz to me: "What is your dream vacation? A. an island retreat B. European tour C. weekend in Las Vegas". He was surprised when I said Las Vegas. Of course I would've said Europe, but I pointed out Las Vegas because I hadn't been there yet!
The "Taxpayers Alliance" is nothing more than the otherwise unemployable dregs of the ruling class. We do not need them any more than the Tories did (and indeed a lot less!)
Haven't done much crafting this week as I had a shoulder op on Monday n it was a bit too sore but I managed to complete the kkkg challenge - only just though - 10 minutes left till close when I added my link! PHEW!!!!
It's a given.
“If sold by your parents to a horny old-man and let got raped is a nice treat for you, then often…”
The South (formerly The Beautiful South) will be entertaining crowds on The Main Stage on Friday 13th July. After 20 years, ten studio albums, five greatest hits compilations, thirty-four chart singles, 15 million record sales worldwide and performing in front of millions of fans, when time was called on The Beautiful South in 2008, not everyone was ready to leave the party. Dave Hemingway and Ali Wheeler, lead singers with the band were having too much fun to get out the pipe and slippers, and so The South was formed.
I used phone book pages as my foundations and covered squares of the phone book paper with my red strings – pushing the red colorway from orangey red to pinky red and everywhere in between including burgundy. Throw it all in there!
His name is Fergus Dudley and his email address is fergus.dudley@bbc.co.uk He's on Twitter as @FergusDudley, though he appears not to have tweeted for quite some time.
Early birds in the states of Montana, South Dakota, Missouri and Mississippi and those driving to work in the cities of St. Louis, MO, Memphis, TN and Columbus, GA may catch a glimpse of the descending craft as it prepares for landing at the Kennedy Space Center, ETA 8:48a.m.
So that we did: we went on over to Macy's and registered for a bride-to-be who didn't quite have the time to register. Since all we had to do was basically get a 100 things on the registry, it didn't matter that Keisa didn't know an ounce about Jenn's style - so we just went to town!
You can see his wet coat and he is curled up trying to escape from the elements.
» 10/26 – Omaha, NE @ Qwest Center
The truth is that the best love stories I’ve ever heard happened between people who connected under the strangest, most unanticipated circumstances. It was simply not predictable and there was no guide-book followed in any of them.
I ran off to Cub, where I took my color-coded grocery shopping list divided up into food categories, my coupons, and my determination to save money. Part of my nesting this time around has included a crazed attempt to be a Couponer. We're talking cross-referencing manufacturer's coupons with weekly sales, making trips to both Target and Cub each week to get the best deals, and making room in the pantry for 48 granola bars at a time because that's what gave us the best deal. I have a contest with myself to see what percentage of my bill I can save in coupons and sales, so getting home to check out the receipt brings me strange exhilaration.
play around with these all week long, doing several projects and I am so in love with these papers!!!
Riddle Question: What kind of car does an electrician drive?
They do say that they have some statistical tricks that allow them to make the correlation look better, but I don’t trust that sort of thing. It’s not real.
The basic gameplay is quite similar to Agricola. A variety of “action spaces” are available on the board, and players take it in turns to place one of their “agents” on a space to claim it and perform its action. These actions range from simply taking resources or currency to more complex activities such as playing “intrigue cards”.
Cook in skillet on medium heat 3 min. on each side or until golden brown on both sides.
Coming from someone who never completed her college degree ( yet ),
University meant owning books, so I neglected the public library for a few years, though I made great use of a university library. Then, a few years on, came the children and weekly visits to the library became a part of our family routine. I loved going to the library with the kids and helping them to choose the books I would later read out to them.
The Forest takes place in a hazily-lit, golden-floored forest, with trees stretching up into infinity with the help of some cleverly-placed mirrors. Mist hangs around it; lights hang in droplets from around the trees. Three performers run into the space, and begin to play: to tangle themselves up in red elastic, slide themselves with enthusiastic shoves from tree to tree, and watch as amazing new things - pine cones and conkers and leaves - fall from the sky.
2. The bouncer is a blonde girl.
When Hudson came into my life there was never any doubt his name would be an homage to the girl who blessed me with Malcolm. Great gifts should be honored thus.
The bouillon cubes mostly came out of a plan to compensate for the lack of meaty flavor when using turkey or chicken in chili. So I tried a couple bouillon cubes, and when combined with beer it was basically like adding a half carton of beer flavored beef broth. Certainly not a bad thing.
Credits: - Franz Volhard
"It's not solid."
1/4 c. veggie oil
You can get tiny glimpses of that when you lose something, and you completely accept that it’s gone. This is a tiny glimpse of death and it can give you a tiny realization – maybe even more than tiny, if you’re ready.
1/2 cup chilled chick peas, rinsed, drained
Sick they are who are doing so, for today neglect them and enjoy this moment of glory when Indian stood with vision and dream to be a nation with equality and justice for all its children.
DeGeneres
I maybe a little while before I can get this one written but it is something to look forward to.
She told him she couldn’t love,
In a press conference/pep rally this morning, before the press and Nets-related staffers, MC David Diamante introduced what he called "the brand identity launch of the Brooklyn Nets."
1 feast
Using temporary counter top protection during a kitchen construction or remodeling project reduces damage from dropped tools, spilled food, and liquid splatter. Surface protection is a cost-effective way to prevent the need to repair or replace valuable marble, granite, or tile counter tops. Following is a brief description of the counter top protection currently available through surface protection suppliers.
Luke Henery was able to confirm this through his experiences.
Register
What I take away from this is at least many that have commented on the first article have made similar comments & critiques as I have made. The second article gives me hope in terms of communicating a better message about renewable energy as well as the potential that climate change can be portrayed similarly & effectively communicated. Additionally, this is certainly a great motivator for my personal academic work & proves to me I have made a great choice.
Turns out, that February 14th, Anthro is launching BHLDN (i'm pronouncing it "Beholden"?) presumably a wedding shop (online? physical stores? don't know). That's virtually all I know. There wasn't much to the email other than a bunch of gorgeous pictures of wedding dresses, bridesmaids dresses, wedding shoes, accessories and all manner of other loveliness.
“Rohit, get inside fast and get my bag with you” (Duh, I wasn’t planning to stand in that heavy Rain)
But that did not change my feeling, or the players, coaches, trainers and other Oregon supporters’ elation after winning the Grand-Daddy of them all. It was absolutely amazing.
By educating our children with decency, and a sense of worth which doesn't require material rewards or the approval of those who have absorbed the toxin of feminism, we can make a difference to our kin. And in the end, the fight against internationalism is a fight for our nearest and dearest. We are on the long journey to victory over the global enemy, and to paraphrase the Chinese philosopher Laozi, every journey begins with the first step.
Hot Planet Mineralized Blush Duo:
a side story --
SH: It doesn't really go with the new shirts you got me.
While a trip seems like a good method of introducing a country, there is too much text spent tying the travel plot line together, and too little information about Canada itself. For example, the travelers visit the Museum of Civilization in Ottawa. “We walked through the Canada Hall, which goes through a thousand years of Canadian history. Cal zoomed through his historical tour at warp speed, then spent the rest of the time going up and down the escalators. Gran took two hours for her tour. She came out looking bug-eyed.” At the surface a “personal” tour of Canada seems appealing, however a longer book with more detail, designed to be browsed will be more enjoyable.
The Leaf earned four stars for occupant protection in front-end crashes, five stars for side crash protection and four stars for resistance to rolling over, resulting in the overall five-star score.
I hadn’t heard much about The Hunger Games, certainly not at all when the books first came out. A couple of months before the movie released I heard the odd thing, someone read the books, someone else asked for a gist of the story….from what I overheard I thought it sounded like a book I read a long time ago called “The Long Walk” by Richard Bachman (an alias belonging to Stephen King). A similar premise in some ways…but it turned out to be very very different.
Not only does the DOD report not include inventories of 238Pu, 241Pu or 242Pu, it is unlikely that 3,919 kilograms (242,000 Ci) is the actual total of 239Pu waste created in the production of nuclear weapons, as a model U.S. commercial nuclear reactor has accumulated 82,568 curies of 239Pu as of Jan. 1, 1995 (1,337 kg).
Building a House
The liberal gay community can’t quite seem to grasp this concept. Are they even liberals at all? They want freedom…for themselves, they want civil rights. If they would put their efforts towards cleaning out the GOP, instead of bad-mouthing it constantly, that would be the party that would be the logical choice for them to support.
OK, I’m a little bit sleepy here. I gotta go to sleep. I’ll update this post later.
Duh!!!! You didn't need my help to create this easy DIY camera strap.
I wanted to be mad but I just couldn't! I couldn't stop laughing as Mike and I were lunging after her in our pajamas in the front yard. If ever a dog has loved mud/water, it's this one. And goodness knows she'd sink if it were above her head! Anyway -- I wasn't sure I'd make it to work last night but I did. Guess that's a good thing since I only worked one night last weekend. Phew! That drive is wearing me out. Between Toby being go, go, go and late nights/early mornings, I'm pooped. Welcome to the real world, I guess! Haha
Brown the sausage, breaking up while cooking. Drain grease. Combine the sausage, beans and salsa. Spread over bottom of 9-inch pie plate or casserole dish. Top with the cheese. Bake at 400 degrees F for 15 minutes or until hot and melty. Top with the tomatoes and green onions. Serve with tortilla chips.
Makes me fucking sick to the stomach knowing these amazing creatures are so traumatised from beatings, which will go on until they pass this earth bound plane. For them I wish it would come sooner & free them from their lives of pure misery.
The ACDP's Steve Swart weighed in, saying his party was opposed to the tolling of suburban roads because of rising fuel prices. He said the government should have thought about the high cost of collecting the tolls before it entered into the R20-billion agreement.
Pours a loosely or even unfiltered brownish red, with a nice dark-ish tan head. Nice bready smell with floral hops.
It has long been known by sociologists, philosophers and psychologists that humans learn about ourselves through knowing others, it is through others’ interpretations of and interactions with us that we form the idea or abstraction of who we are as an individual.
The day grew brighter but not warmer, and detectives filed in and out of the home. They gathered on the lawn, talked, split off to speak into their phones, regrouped, and ambled back into the house for another round at the scene.
1992 Rubika (14th); 2000 The Last Fling (7th); Esprit De Cotte (Fell 22nd); 2001 The Last Fling (UR 5th), Esprit De Cotte (UR 11th); 2002 Goguenard (Fell 1st), Beau (UR
Okay, I promise not to stay away so long this time... did I make it up with all my "love" projects? Sort of? ;;)
Rescue Pegs provide safe foot placement for riders injured far from safety. In the event a rider is injured and needs to be ridden out to safety or medical care, Rescue Pegs provide an easy place for the rider to place their feet without interfering with the driver’s controls or balance.
Recently I spoke on the same platform with a Tory and a Liberal. They said they would abide by the result of the referendum. I said I wouldn't. I would always listen to any argument for the continuation of the union if one can be found. I have heard none except that change is bad. I asserted a principle. That Scotland is a nation. Nations should govern themselves. Can anything be clearer?
2023.***E-VIII/28/1971. On the irresponsibility of the United States in collaborating with the Greek Colonels. Chicago Sun-Times, August 28, 1971, p. 18; Chicago Today, August 31, 1971, p. 17. (Incorporated in Item B-2, above, p. 229 (1975).)
This fruit salad is light and refreshing. You can use any Greek wine you can find. However, I reccommend Mavrodaphne. It is a dessert wine and very sweet - this makes it better suited in this fruit salad. The fruits that were chosen were available in Ancient Greece - at least their ancestors were. The fruits that are available now may be slightly different than they were back then.
I am always thinking of my dear friend & sorority sister, Shannon, who is undergoing treatment for cancer. I proudly wear my FIGHT CLUB bracelet to show my love & support for her!
Constable Phil Cranmer investigated the collision that sent the 15-year-old Highland student to hospital.
And there’s public transportation, because we all gotta go places.
Former councillors from various areas have told me about corruption and backhanders and this is what we must expose. Those who can be shown to have taken bribes to demolish buildings and redevelop our towns and cities must be exposed.
Mighty waters cannot extinguish love;
Today, I want to continue forward in our exploration of the remarkable life of Timothy because I believe that there are staggeringly beautiful gems to mine down in the deep shafts of “incidental words.” So why don’t we start by talking about the age of Timothy. Read with me the words of the Apostle Paul found in 1 Timothy 4:12:
aaaaaaaaawwwww yeaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaah
Balsamic Vinaigrette, homemade or store-bought
In a series of tweets, AirAsia CEO Tan Sri Tony Fernandes raised questions on MAHB’s operations, the effectiveness of members of parliament and the objectivity of the Transport Ministry
A sigh of muted disappointment. All the recent jokes about the title of this film led me to watch it. It was vexing.
This lady is taking the day off to enjoy some shopping and lunch in the city.
Easter Sunday Birthday: righteous day
“Yes,” she started answering before I even finished speaking. “You are a Chasshole. (An asshole from Chicago).”
Hope you can take some time to visit the designers' blogs for Dreamweaver and Impression Obsession! You'll see all the links in the right sidebar.
57ish basic heals.
Being a trailblazer is hard and it takes belief and patience. It also takes perseverance. Sometimes, in the darkest of times, when you just want to give up is when you have to be your strongest and tell yourself it’s going to be OK. To let go and release it to the universe and know there is a higher calling and greater good that has your back.
my thoughts tend to shiver their way toward things that will keep me warm.
We’ll throw this on the already massive list of conceptually awesome rogue abilities that do exactly nothing outside of PvP.
Team Dave decorated the lawn with Daveypops after the race. After Dave passed us and rejoin the race, a woman behind him said, "Oh, You're Dave" as I'm sure she saw Team Dave and our Daveypops along the route! :)
Item no. : DFD222210B004
Are you always pinching that TV remote every two minutes to switch to a different channel because this one just hasn’t got anything that interests you? Are you always on the phone while watching your “favorite” programs on television? These are obvious signs that you are losing interest in your current TV programs. It is time to switch to Satellite TV.
Go under the cut for the performance cuts.
On Sunday my mom and sister were still visiting. After the Green Thumb Festival we went grocery shopping. I won’t be with my mom for Mother’s Day so we decided to go ahead and celebrate that night. My mom loves crab legs so I decided to treat her to a nice meal since Publix with steam seafood for you.
ACTIVE REST DAY
The balloon is inflated, compressing the plaque to enlarge the blood vessel and open the blocked artery. The balloon is deflated and the catheter is removed. Sometimes a metal stent is placed in the artery to prevent closing.
1. Young Guns & Young Girls
you can find this statement:
Shoes: BCBGirls
Outside of wishing he had killed Logan when he had the chance, Kemp said at his sentencing that he had no regrets.
The investment in new skills and mastering that machine can take you far!
promise of God is clear. If we love him and live our lives according to his
Within a few minutes “Kevin” was sitting on a lawn chair, happily enjoying a drink and pleasant conversation. The job of being a phony philatelist wasn’t that difficult after all. Until...
Jimmy Page Guitar
Now that I have a couple more years of blogging (and trading) under my belt, I think there is another way to classify collectors - i.e. you can be a Type 2A or Type 2B collector now!
While "The Eye" barely acknowledges that Kukl's lead singer and the Björk of "Debut" fame are on in the same person, some of those delightful yelps of glee and characteristic touches of vocal magic make and early appearance on "Holiday In Europe". Both LPs were re-pressed at various intervals throughout the 1980s, after the international success of the Sugarcubes.
The winning entry will be verified so be sure to leave accurate links or information.
The ward spent more time without a paediatric nurse than with one.
"Arlington's Garden path" is available on DPW auction.
On the way home Party Time pulled his copy of Pimp from the glove box and started to read out loud from it. After a minute I stopped him.
MOUNTAIN brings this recognizable plot into an environment cultivated by war and
Suzie? What say you? Suzie?!!
Columbia, SC 29205
Blur Song 2 UK
This is because the historical account now is picturing what God did at the beginning of the great tribulation. When He ended the church age, and loosed Satan to take his seat as the man of sin within the churches and congregations of the world.
The coach didn’t reserve his ire for members of his audience entirely. He also had a few choice comments for his tailbacks.
Pastor Ernie
The logistical achievements have not been matched by political progress. Southerners will go to the polls without knowing the exact position of their border with the north or how much of Sudan's debt they will have to shoulder after a split.
Here's an example of the Su Casa style... don't you just love it?
We can see their obsession and physical drive back in their childhood together where they would race freight trains through the railway tunnel that runs beneath the Detroit river.
There are plenty of sides and shades to Amanda Chariss. The best way to get to know her, of course, is to read about her in the trilogy, to follow her through her arc. I’ve lived with her in my head for years now so I know her like a sister. She’s a beloved friend to me. I hope that folks who come to the series as new readers will find a friend in her as well. There’s a quick little description of her in the “Character Sketches” section of the Worlds link on my new Web site at www.authorsandylender.com.
After 2 weeks of being sick Jadyn finally got over her infection. She was on IV's and did not get to eat for 10 days which was so sad, especially at the end of her sickness when she was starting to get hungry and wanted food. For 8 of the days that she was sick, so was I with a mild head cold. So I stayed away too scared to give her anything on top of the infection she had. I think that one of the hardest things I had to go through since she was born.
And I need to redo the tutorials I have for piecing diamonds, and my quilt binding tutorial… I hadn’t learned to be patient and do pictures during the day or how to use the macro button back then. It’s about time I pull out an almost finish doll quilt and do that!
Me: Happy Birthday to You, Happy Birthday to you, I hope I didn’t wake you, Happy Birthday to you!
Wearing a faux engagement ring makes traveling solo a lot easier.
Fortune favours the bold. If firms are to fight off their existing and threatened challengers and beat their rivals, they will do so by first honestly and openly assessing their strategies and by making sure that they are not deluding themselves into a false sense of security. They must recognise that a compelling competitive strategy will require risk-taking and a huge degree of change in attitudes, behaviours and working practices amongst partners, who will be required to experiment and learn new ways of doing things. Some firms and partners will discover, too late in the day, that they are saying ruefully to themselves “what happened to our practice?”.
That single statistic justifies the hypothesis that we are already in the early stages of anti-Afrikaner genocide.
James, you take care of yourself as much as you want others to care for you. And listen as much as you speak. And be happy.
So, it’s a complete long shot, but if anyone in the Trafford/Greater Manchester area (UK) can recommend to me a good bathroom fitter, we’d love to consider them.
Michael Tolkien, the grandson of legendary J R R Tolkien, has signed a two title contract with Thames River Press. Both books will contain the stories JRR used to narrate to Michael as a child. WISH and RAINBOW are scheduled to be released later this year.
There is a promotion throughout April, where you can achieve FREE goods. Then even more exciting we have a new mini catalogue coming May 1st...
(notice the change of outfit? now i am sitting in the car waiting for my big girl to finish zumba)
In announcing Atlantic Yards in December 2003, developer Forest City Ratner predicted groundbreaking within a year. That was probably optimistic, but I doubt they believed it would take two years more than planned. So opponents and critics had some effect.
Greens of some sort make a daily appearance in the meals served at our house. I'm in the midst of planning my garden, and next to tomatoes, greens will have the largest presence. Right now we are planning what to plant where in the beds, trying to decide the best material to use to build them, and starting seeds. I'm so excited to have a garden again! I'll share pictures once we get things rolling.
Wilhelm Seefeldt - Synthesizers, Computer
Happy Friday...y'all have a fabulous weekend!! xo.
Would you testify of Jesus Christ knowing you are the only believer present? The apostle Paul did it time and again, oftentimes facing severe opposition. He sincerely believed what he wrote in Romans 8:31. “If God be for us, who can be against us?”
“Why wasn’t I consulted,” which I abbreviate as WWIC, is the fundamental question of the web.
Craft- What were the disciples doing when Jesus called out to them? (Fishing from their boat.)
Jacket: H&M.
Hi hi everyone! Here are the projects I created with the lovely Burlap and Buttercups December kit! Make sure you go snag yourself one too :)
Together with the leg leather-based trolley suitcase courses are looked after over at 18.
He'd been going through Pam's notes she takes meticulously every three weeks, when I get an Avastin infusion at Oncology.
Standing at the Edge
mandy sat alone in her room. her fingers entwined in the pink cord leading to the princess handset pressed firmly to her right ear. as she listened, she was aware of the post from her pearl earring poking into the side of her skull and the water dripping in the bathroom sink. the last light of the late spring afternoon had turned golden and shattered as it hit the thin slats of her blinds.
"The last nurse let me have ice chips!"
Meanwhile the drow know something’s gone bad, so they are making their escape out onto the roof. The thief, who is doing quite well, hides, climbs, moves silently, the whole bit as she stalks up the roof for a backstab onto the male drow bodyguard.
Sorry folks, this was going to be a click and go....but I did stipulate about the sadness of the comments and check out the last couple of click and goes.....I am going to assume that you don't like them that way, since the comments were slim to none. So...I will go back to downloads
As far as I could see every possible eventuality for the male wardrobe could be covered by a carefully selected item in each of these categories. I can’t say that I rigidly followed these but they were my guiding principles. Occasionally, I would own more than one pair of smart black shoes as one pair overlapped with the ones that were being replaced, etc.
but the question is of fire.
Turning back towards number 37, the rather sad, empty state of this building is due to the vagaries of fashion rather than questions of security. Following a recent renovation it is in as perfect condition today as it was when inaugurated 50 years ago, but it is now struggling to find new residents. Such buildings have become commonplace, and what was innovative has slowly become charmingly retro. It is though still a remarkable building, with stacked balconies on the higher levels leading up towards a rooftop terrace that gives wonderful views across the city as well as the impression of standing on the bow of a ship.
17 May
Think March 9, 1989, when the power grid in Quebec, Canada, took a 6,000,000 residential household nap after a large CME event.
Even if you’re not into gardening, put a chair in your back yard and chill with a book or a glass of cold minted green tea (or hot depending on the climate!), and let nature do its magic on your mind, body and soul. It will, you know.
‘Gulls’ by A J Ashworth
Since last November, we have put all of our plans on hold. Apart from Christmas, we have not left Hong Kong. I withdrew from my university classes so that I could support Maddy through surgery. We were given the impression that surgery would have been significantly earlier than it has been (on a side note, not only have my plans been on hold - my Mum has agreed to come to Hong Kong to help us with Maddy's recovery period. Her plans have also been on hold now for the past four months). We cannot continue to be so flexible and we now have travel plans at the end of April. If you cannot guarantee that Maddy will be safe to fly before we travel, we will not be able to do surgery within the next few weeks.
Lexicon word of the day: iniquity.
The search in ernest has started for some children's movies in Mandarin to play off the Xoom on the trip home.. 15 hours is a long flight...and something to fall back on if she is fussy would be great.
Now that the war of liberation is over and most of Iraq has been pacified and stabilized from the terrorist insurgency, Iraq’s economy is not only growing but is poised for hyper-growth. Analysts expect Iraq’s GDP to grow by more than 9% annually for the next few years, and expect Iraq’s oil production to nearly triple by 2017.
I have started work on the front flower garden the shape it better with the plants that are already there.
Although the needed broad-based recovery has been elusive, Larimer County is expected to reach pre-recession employment levels next year. While this is promising news, it is possible the unemployment rate will remain relatively high because job growth will continue to lag behind growth in the labor force.
FAQ's:
Other things are going okay, I guess. I am still finding it extremely hard to settle in here. I am not ‘unhappy’ but I am certainly struggling being back. It’s lonely! I have many friends, but I don’t see them very often as they are all tied up with family life etc. That’s okay, I didn’t expect everyones life to stop while I did my thing, but it does make it harder and I find Sydney not that easy to get out and about and meet new people. My job is going well, I get on really well with the people I am working with and my boss is very happy with me. I have been out a couple of times with work colleagues, which is nice, but I feel that it is going to be a slow process of making friends that way. Lately I feel that things have been up and down.
1 1/4 cup plain soy milk
“By defining our identity clearly, proudly, unashamedly, everyone stands to gain. Regardless of whether the product is simple or complicated, the best known names are built on the same foundation — a strong brand essence, robust brand positioning and powerful brand insight that speaks to the hearts, minds and wallets of consumers.”
Whether you take it in the spiritual/metaphysical purpose-seeking sense or the small, everyday practical sense, we’re always looking for something. We all like to hunt (and by this I mean search for things, not necessarily kill them and put their heads over the living room fireplace, which would be especially unfortunate if you, like Elmer Fudd, prefer to hunt innocent yet humorous rabbits such as Bugs Bunny).
After the performance the kids said to me that prior to going on stage they were quite nervous, but that they had so much fun and want to do it again.
here are my 3 faves since our August term kicked off, in no particular order....
The Sisterhood always knows best.
Take me.
Cue the hate mail, but bear in mind, as a rabid media consumer, I will probably be there opening night for Catching Fire. In doing so I am part of the problem. JUST A STATISTIC, YO. Kudos to the marketing team for hitting a home run. Prometheus can’t come any sooner.
P.S. It should be noted that I almost "ruined" the surprise party on a few occasions. Eric was surprised that I was actually surprised as he thought for sure I knew he was at least up to something. Here is how I almost found out:
2010.09.01 Afghanistan Kandahar 2 2 Two Afghans are blown to bits by a Taliban bomb hidden on a motorcycle.
1:45PM - Finish up the bread sauce and make the gravy.
Sweet Dreams!
With regards to Peter Lion’s recent comments that (more or less) he wouldn’t return to Real Madrid since José Mourinho is continuing as coach, Aitor said, “I think Pedro is wrong. If he’s not coming back next year, it’s not because Mourinho is here, but because of the season he’s had, it has been practically the same as the one he had here last year. To return here, the clear example is José Callejón. You have to show your quality, play and deserve to come back. To play in Madrid, you have to demonstrate things, and Callejón, for example, has done that. This is what is important, not who the coach is.” Ouch! Aitor was more affectionate with Ricardo Carvalho: “for Ricardo, it has been a bad season, because a player of his quality and charisma always wants to play. He’s a professional, a player that has won many things in his career and one of those who always trains hard with the age he has and is an example for others. It’s a shame, but you have to choose 11 and then seven others for the call-up. It’s a shame that he can’t go, but we have to choose.”
The artwork in Haymarket left me awestruck. When you walk into the front lobby there is a massive black and white oil painting --- that actually took my breath away. It was done by a local London artist named Robert Virtue. The use of such a large piece in a moderate sized space works and pulls the entire room together.
“Nothing,” I said, staring wistfully off into the distance for a moment. “Achilles, old chum, I think by means of her expedient departure, my lady love has given her consent to my previous inquiry as to whether I could secure her permission as to your proffered diversion.”
Vegan diets are plant-based foods and they don’t eat any animal products. Items like milk, cheese, and eggs are allowed in some forms of vegetarian diets.
If people who didn’t play golf were discriminated against, then we’d make a bigger deal about that, too. But people who don’t play golf can still get elected to Congress all across the country. People who don’t believe in god are banned from even runningfor office in several states (at least in the books). . . .
2 shots espresso (I use decaf, you can also use strongly brewed coffee)
And this only took me an hour to do!
School has been going well other then once running out of time on math homework , ( which doesn't really matter since 4 homework grades are dropped) My last math test was 94 which was nice.
Light and light of love
I always feel like I am the only mom that is waiting on pin and needles for "breaks" to come to an end and to send the cherubs back to school. Everyone else seems to enjoy the "free" time with their kids. Me? No, I run a tight ship. A rigid schedule. I don't like to live on the edge. I like to know that by 8:15am the kids will be safely deposited into the care of their wonderful teachers...such blessed souls. Besides, I still have Faith, whom I have decided is part monkey, ( DEFINITELY her father's DNA) that I have to peel from the light fixture hanging over the kitchen table. This kid IS a full time job all on her own.
We trust.
Tactics as driver: Try and predict where the gunner is firing and make the job easier for them- get targets in optimum range. If they’re decent, they’ll be firing on a target you may have missed. Keeping good mobility is important, but too fast will make you useless. Make sure if you do stop that the vehicle has a clear lane of escape when you do decide to accelerate again. Slow down for turns unless you’re very good (in which case a basic guide like this is useless). Ramming with a warthog is quite hard and easy to dodge although armor lock typically won’t destroy a bad attempt (but will send the ‘hog flying).
When I went to visit her, her skin stank, her stoma around her tracheotomy was bloody and dirty, she was in a tiny warm room with no fan or air conditioning, she is not allowed in a bath, she is not allowed to go out for walk, the staff don’t know a cough assist, which is terrible, as a cough assist is VITAL to her care, not knowing how to work this is unacceptable because if something happens and they don’t know, Emma could die!!!!! She has a cut on her neck after the nurses put a string on her skin with no sponge underneath resulting in this terrible cut!!!!!
Still, there's an opportunity in this setback. Now is the time for feminism to reach out to black women via the contingent of Obama-esque overachievers out there who ought to be chilled to the bone by Michelle's retirement from work of her own.
This isn’t just a romance, it is filled with plenty of heartfelt moments, action of both the steamy kind and adventure kind, it had everything you could want from an m/m romance read with a little mystery and plenty of suspense. I liked how each character really had a personality of their own and didn’t get lost in the words or telling of the story. The twists and turns in the book were easy to keep up with and it didn’t feel bogged down with too much information, it flowed and I really got caught up in the story, I didn’t want it to end. I wanted to read more about Evan and Kyle, how everything is now that they have found each other, if they do end up with a family and the life they want together. I really loved Evan and Kyle as characters, they were amazing to read and even though frustrating at times with not putting their issues behind them and being together sooner, I couldn’t help but enjoy every second of them together. I would give this between 3 and a half and borderline four stars. Great read.
There is a considerable amount we, as IP Managers or Attorney's, can learn about patent process from the Early Adopter internet geeks in this world.
"Kappel said police are looking for a silver or white Chrysler 300 four-door sedan with low-profile tires and large rims."
Are you like that?
Future setting?
I think it's just cozy autumn weather settling into my soul.
“Whatever,” she replies. “We both know I’m not going to marry anyone from here.”
I am super late in posting about my first ever trade with The Daily Dimwit. You can see what I sent Sam here on his blog - two Delino DeShields Jr. autographs from 2011 Bowman Draft and 2011 Playoff Contenders. Sam has a nice scan of the cards on his post. I am stoked for what I got in the trade:
Like I said, my challenge quilt was a learning experience....I learned to do piping, foundation piecing, string, piano keys, pouncing, thread painting, and most importantly 'how to recognize when one is wasting their time'. Shoot me next year if I so much as mention participating in this again :)
.@MyPretendDog is the best dog ever.
Oh and I heart heart tights like I heart all of you...and that is a lot of heart.
So, a few things. Not that it makes him any less dangerous, but in no way do I believe this represents a majority opinion of the country's, or even the south's for that matter, pastors. Not even close.
When Jack will be ONE!
Two more (less stressful, I think) semesters and I'll be completely done.
Paper Airplanes
Anyway, stumbling closer to get a better eyeful of what they assume is a convenient orgy staged for their voyeuristic pleasure, the boys get more than they bargained for when what they actually witness is a Satanic rite that culminates in the ritual murder of a young girl, but they did get to see boobies so the spectacle wasn’t entirely wasted for them. Just as the boys are realising that their best course of action is to sneak quietly away and alert the appropriate authorities, ‘Hot Lips’ Houlihan marches into the fray and ruins the covert perving by yelling at the boys to come in for their tea, or something. Thanks to Hot Lips the Satanists now know that their evil privacy has been invaded by half-drunk tourists and unsurprisingly they’re non to happy about it.
7. She didn’t learn to drive. She has never visited me any place I’ve lived as an adult or in college.
I both chuckled and cringed when I read that. I laughed because it seems ridiculous to hide from a sovereign God in a pile of suitcases. I cringed because I have tried to hide among the baggage too. More times than I would like to admit. I have hidden behind my past, or my inability, or my fear of failure, or any other number of excuses - ducking out on callings I know God has issued to me.
As a conclusion, it was abso-f*cking-lutely-fantastic! The end.
Lullabies, dreams, and love ever after.
Boots - Frye
I haven't been into meat lately. The pastured lamb is staying in the freezer for now. Having already let go of grains and sugar there hasn't really been much in the time-to-say-goodbye department.
But before I get all judgy, let me say that I think a lot of writers, myself included, have the exact same problem. People read our work, whether it's critique partners or editors or book bloggers or everyday readers, and they make their assessments, and we sit there thinking "but that's not what it says!" or "well, that's not what I meant!" or "you totally missed the point!"
Stop it now. Right this minute. They aren't even NICE. They are all ripped and everything! Why did you even keep them?! And why would you do this to yourself? What is your problem, you psycho?
